And we installed a new fan! Woo Hoo!!
I evaded her gaze by sweeping
“mummy, you know at nursery?, you know the door that’s blue on one side, the side for sitting, and white on the other side, the side for waiting , and there is a red door before that, that is red in the side not for sitting too, is that one after the green door?”
2.Spinach - 2 cups
Christmas Shoplifting
No, you are not a politician.
8 word (or less) travel mantra…
You can check out the full story about Olly Cromwell, the Bexleyheath councillors and the latest updates on #c*ntgate HERE. And, if you should be reading this Olly, I’m stunned at the outcome so you must be feeling like you’re leaving in an absolute nightmare.
I hope you can take the time to stop at Cardabilities to play in their challenge...and don't forget to see the interpretations of this sketch from the Dreamweaver Dream Team too...their blog links are on the right hand sidebar.
Can you guess what that is children?
If the person in question must lose some weight, in order to reach her/his healthy weight, it is a healthy option for her/him to choose a long term weight loss program, which causes loss of the body’s fat, while preserving the muscles mass. To obtain this successfully, she/he must control her/his appetite, by eating when he/she is physically hungry, cutting the saturated and hydrogenated fats by 20 to 25% of the total of the intake calories, but not the unsaturated fats; the carbohydrate intake must be cut between 10 to 20% of the total of intake calories, but not more, as it may causes side effects; the proteins must be increased by 1.6gr per each kg of body’s weight.
Marge lived in a little flat connected to the Lime Grove hostel: one of West London's major drug wash-up shores. Most addicts in the borough would end up being filtered through there at some point or other. And it wasn't a bad deal: free board and food and a cell check twice a day! It was packed to the tiles with mostly long term, mentally ill addicts who'd wash their smack down with Tenants Super and whatever downers or sleepers their stench had forced the local GP to prescribe them. Marge wasn't in the hostel proper but had somehow managed to wrangle one of the permanent flats on its premises. That was kinda like everyone's dream in those days: to get one of the self-sufficient Lime Grove flats. They were the after-junk-life paradise offered up by the God of the Hostel. The only catch was that to get one you had to be either sober or dying, and that's why for there only being five flats up for grabs the hostel was able to 'permanently' rehouse 50 people a year. That its success was based on its rate of eviction no-one seemed to care about. Housing and evicting fifty people were better statistics than housing only five. Anyway, these little apartments sat just below, down where all the hostel residents could see and drool over them. There were no throw out times, no bars on the windows, no sign-in desk. It was freedom for the lucky few; a place to secretly kill yourself in peace. Only for the lucky few who had ascended to Hostel Heaven it wasn't so much a paradise as an open hell: a den of addicts all cohabiting and thieving off each other. As everyone had once dreamt of getting out the hostel now they dreamt the same of this place. Only this was permanent and there were only two ways out, and neither was a very attractive proposition. So it was a dream turned to shit, and this is where Marge lived and where I knocked him up that bright autumn Sunday afternoon.
Boston/City-Year – I spent the bulk of my time at Northeastern University’s International Village dormitory. Although most of my time was spent in workshops or with colleagues – we did get to visit a little. I was able to steal away with a friend of mine one night and visited Harvard’s campus and ate a japanese-fusion place with great outdoor seating and drinks!
Now, the Spouse Sparrow is quite shy and modest, and blushes easily. It's taken quite a lot of totty being thrown at him, and me harping on about it, before he even realized what was up. And now this, with Dr. DeVil, on top of it all.
I feel as though the breath has been knocked out of me and I am gasping, just waiting for it to return.
From the parking area head in SW direction across the slickrock to the rim of the canyon. From there, follow the carins toward the rock ledge and look for a boulder near the edge of the canyon rim- you will enter the canyon by passing between the boulder and the wall of the canyon. The hike is about 1/2 mile round-trip.
*No warfare between Israel and Iran, at least not until November.
Overall, if you don't know anything about being a bike messenger I imagine this book would be illuminating. Even considering all the boring parts and the author's blatant self-absorption, I'm glad to have read it. But as a rabid biker and ex-messenger myself, I expected a broader scope, and a much more detailed look at the issues of biking in today's American cities.
until my toes point to the ceiling my two legs as one
Vern’s days of major chart success were about over by the time Nickels and Dimes and Love was released in March 1993, not surprisingly for an artist 58 years old. Although the hits had largely stopped, the excellent recordings continued in abundance. This album has a little different history behind it than Vern’s other Columbia releases as producer Rick Hall took Vern to Muscle Shoals, Alabama, to record this album.
-A sextant
Okay, you can have your laugh for the day over this one. A friend introduced me to Steampunk about a month ago and it intrigued me to the point that I was willing to "take it on" and step out of my box. So I gathered all my fun stuff and started creating this 12 block shadow box (felt more like a 12-step program if you get my drift).
-Sets of images from two more currently unposted weddings (both of which encompassed my past two weekends!)
My Thoughts: This book was incredibley intense. Fallon has written a wonderful set of short stories about life on Fort Hood and in Iraq. There are stories from the point of view of army wives and some from the point of view of the men returning. The stories are heart-breaking, horrifying and some leave you feeling like you have just been punched in the stomach. The stories sucked me in and made me feel like I knew these characters. I liked that, even though this was a set of individual stories, some of the characters from one story would make an appearance in another story. It was interesting to see how all these peoples' lives were intertwined and there was a definite sense of family among the people living on the base. I normally am not a fan of short story collections but this is definitely one of the best books I have read this year. 5 stars.
Well, the soup was enjoyed by all. One of many things I'm thankful for. But, what will we have tomorrow?
I saw a link to Air B+B in an Apartment Therapy post back in March. I had never heard of it before, but thought it seemed pretty cool. I’ve been a host with US Servas for several years (an international home stay group), but hardly ever get any visitors. I love being a hostess, and I’ve really enjoyed being a host and a traveler with Servas, so I thought I’d sign up to Air B+B and see what happened. (Another difference is that I pay to be a host with Servas and get no fee from travellers, but with Air B+B, people actually pay to stay in my house — crazy!).
Not exactly what you were dreaming of.
go home with a lovely keepsake that will be ready to just add your photos to and it’s sure to be
The movie proved that a comic book source material can be treated seriously and without a tongue in cheek attitude towards anything out of the ordinary, resulting in a dark and highly entertaining piece of comic book cinema. The script was respectful to the source material, but added elements such as Kristofferson’s character Whistler, and elements of Blade’s struggle with what he is, that helped to make the story work in a cinematic context. The movie successfully made almost three times it’s budget of $45 million in the world box office, establishing the character enough to spawn two further movies and a tv-series spin-off.
“I then asked what considerations determined her attitude to pictures in general, and she relied with equal sincerity that they were, of course, considerations of aesthetic quality – “composition, colour, harmony, power, what have you.” She honestly believed to be guided by purely aesthetic value-judgements based on those qualities; but if that was the case, since the qualities of the picture had not changed, how could her attitude to it have changed?”
BRIAN JONESTOWN MASSACRE - Aufheben
immense growth in internet use
Downward Spiral
Sure, it’s always situational — there are demanding people and there are people who genuinely don’t have two minutes to themselves. But I’m not the former and The MBA isn’t the latter. If he wanted it more, things might be different, regardless of his hectic lifestyle.
The symbol of newness,
5. Make sure to provide a valid email address with your entry so that you can be easily reached.
If you missed it, I'm hosting this amazing giveaway right now! You can go check out details about how to enter HERE!
Then, early this summer, the creeping voice became too loud to ignore. It forced me to face facts: I’m a single mom. I’m saddled with student loan debt. I desperately need to devote more time to income-providing activities, not less. I live in a foreign country and have no family to help out. And…I’m only one human.
But even that, as sweet as it sounds, doesn't always deflect the criticisms. When they do come, there are a number of ways a parent can respond. Some parents choose the "fuck you" approach. In practical terms, this often takes the form of "my choices are not up for discussion, and if that doesn't work for you then stay away." That's an okay approach for as far as it gets you, which is often to a place of hurt, conflict, an negativity. I have always resisted this approach, based on something my Dad told me when I was very young: when you wrestle with a pig, the pig has a blast and you just get crap all over yourself. Nothing joyful or productive about that.
You can hear Meigs Creek before you actually get to it, and it's a typically gorgeous little mountain creek. Lots of rocks and little pools, with the banks overhung with rhododendron & hemlock (although sadly many of the hemlocks are dead or dying from the Hemlock Wooly Adelgid infestation). There are no bridges across the creek, and I counted 18 crossings ranging from around 8 feet across to less than 2 feet. But the water was low today and there was no problem rock hopping.
** you will need to bring 3x 8’’ + 2x 6’’ mud cakes** recipe will be provided
A disappointing training day. With the broken treadmill my highly motivating wife suggested we go to a gym, and we found one in Celebrity Fitness, a chain of gyms with an outlet in Mid Valley Megamall, a 10 minute drive from the house and a building full of distractions for Amanda, Emily and Emily’s Grandpa, who volunteered as chauffeur and local guide.
But the opposition is also deeply sceptical Assad will carry it out, believing he has accepted the plan just to win time while his forces continue their assault to crush the uprising.
Hoping to share some pictures from this weekend's show either this weekend if I have time or sometime next week. For now, Mahalo for stopping by! Hope you all have a fabulous Friday!
So what does a "Mother of the Bride" do when it is approximately six months before her daughter's wedding and she is not happy with her appearance? She joins a gym to workout a couple of hours every day and she goes on a low fat diet consisting primarily of vegetables. At least that is what I am doing, and why I was happy to see this recipe for Sweet Potato and Lentil Soup in the December, 2011 issue of the Food Network Magazine. The ingredients of sweet potatoes, carrots, leeks, and red lentils, seasoned with fresh ginger and curry, sounded very appealing to me, and the approximate 257 calories a serving was a definite plus!
View from the south.
For the kingdom, the power, and the glory are yours,
Other upgrades include a Magnetic Stir Plate and other miscellaneous equipment for yeast storage and propogation. For 10 gallons of wort, you need a lot of yeast!! Just ask Mr. Malty!
I think the ultimate balance is being able to do what you love for work, designating time to spend with the people important to you, and enjoying the journey that is made up of every minute of every day of your life.
Judah's book turned out hilarious. Here are some sample questions:
Relief. The strange dog was behind the factory fence, unable to do harm. I put down my aggrieved little dog and we continued our walk, the strange dog still barking behind us in the night.
Basically, he's no longer a little boy. He's still young, but he's bursting at the seams to be all grown up and is doing a fine job of it.
Header Photo Collage Posts:
Elements of the ending were certainly inspired by 2001: A Space Odyssey. The Star Child in 2001 and the godlike boy at the finale of Mass Effect 3 are definitely artistically tied. However, the god child is not the object or result of the game as it is in Kubric's and Clarke's masterpiece. In 2001, the Star Child is the object of David Bowman's surrealistic and abstract journey--the unknown, unseen, and incredibly highly evolved entities evolve Bowman into something more similar to themselves. The protagonist is humanity as a whole and the objective for Clarke and Kubric is to demonstrate our future and our evolution into something greater.
Common problems with inhaler devices
I started off writing some comedy sketches for my theatre company - which mostly involved boys dressed up as girls. I then embarked on a long and complex novel about the first two years I lived in Israel. It was for a slightly older audience than Phoebe and I very naively sort of wrote it and sent it off convinced it would be fought over at some huge auction and then published to critical acclaim!!! In the event one publisher was interested in it and while they held on to it for quite a long time it was eventually turned down. It was a great learning experience but when I think about it now I cringe!
....I ask you, do we weally want a man as a first wady? That just isn't wight! You think Hilwawey has ugwy fat ankles and calves? We don't need to see him in a dwess, do we? I guess she thinks it might make her wook better. Ha-ha-ha! Well, it's funny in Mr. Bush's Neighborhood!
The peach tree my son in law planted when they first moved here three years ago is always good for a few nice shots. It is also a good source for some fun family memories. After capturing a few shots from various angles I was distracted by the beauty of the sky.
Anyway.
They don't even have a pony in this race.
Bright Spots:
Some of you have read my haiku posts in this blog and have become fairly well-acquainted with haiku. Our Haikufest will give you the opportunity to raise questions about the form to our members. And, in the final segment, you can enter our audience haiku contest. (Society members are excluded from this). First, Second, and Third place winners will each receive a copy of Frogpond, our Society’s book-length journal. It not only contains haiku and related forms, but insightful essays.
That's right. We are finally potty training Andrew!!!
We'll hit the bookstore afterwards and have dinner out at Pip's favorite restaurant.
"I'm sure we can make room," I reply.
I have given and given and I will always receive what I need, but not always from those I have given to. If I truly believe that giving is a circle, like everything else in life, then I have to believe that those who were helped by money I gave them have helped or will help others in return.
While we certainly affirm the value of leading bible studies, it seems that at the root of this man’s discontent was not wrong activity, but wrong understanding. He (and the conference organisers) had undersold the value of the world. They failed to realise that this man’s primary witness to the world is given as a carpenter. As this man works skilfully with wood, making joints and splitting the pencil line with a saw cut, he calls attention to Christ’s powerful and creative reign. He advertises Christ’s Lordship as he relates to other tradesman in a way that challenges idols of selfishness, sensuality and individualism. And as he works, the words of his mouth and the shape of his life witness to the cross and resurrection.
May 2
Lastly, I’m told that I will need to wear woman’s clothing, preferably a dress.
There are millions of Vietnamese adults living in the U.S., and as American citizens, we all have the vote. If we show the politicians that we are united, they will listen to what we have to say. It does not have to be Barack Obama that we are calling upon. If our voice is strong enough, other candidates will come to us, instead of the other way around. It is not out of the question for Governor Mitt Romney to throw is support behind us if we are willing to reciprocate with our votes.
~EFG Staff
I originally meant this to be more or less a space dungeon for the characters to crawl around in, and it was, but in the end I mostly focused on combat encounters. The party had fun in the previous game fighting zombie hordes and a couple mutated monsters, but in this session it was time to face Sinaes and his hideious apprentices. Good thing we had a full group that session.
The upcountry is beautiful…
It's interesting that even though I have been through so much, and I know how suddenly life can change, I can still get caught up in the day to day craziness of life, without realizing that I am failing to stop, and take time to enjoy all of it! So as I come up on this milestone anniversary, I am taking some time to reflect, and take stock of my life now. I am so grateful for my good health. I will re-focus, and make adjustments, where my life is out of balance.
Oh... my... goodness!
I don't know if it's because I'm older and have more experience, or because of the miscarriages or whatever, but I worry so much. Billy is still completely breastfed, which I'm delighted about as his two older brothers were only fed like this for three short weeks. Billy has five teeth and yet he doesn't show any interest in eating anything solid!! I've tried offering various bits from my plate and he'll have a little taste and then does a dramatic shudder which makes us laugh and lets us know exactly what he thinks of my cooking!! He sleeps very well, usually nodding off around 10pm and not waking till around 5am or sometimes 6am for his feed. And he's growing, growing, growing!! Maybe his little body is putting all it's energy into growing and the toe-touching, rolling and sitting will all come later. Maybe he just plain doesn't WANT to touch his toes!!! It's now that I miss not having a mother figure to turn to. Someone to say, "He's fine, he's beautiful, you're doing a great job. Relax.". When my children have babies of their own, I want to be there for that. So, I just cuddle him lots and lots and everywhere I go, Billy goes too. He LOVED B&Q!! Ok, maybe I exaggerate, but he certainly liked sitting in the sling and watching me humping bags of compost into the trolley. He smiles. He laughs. He's happy. Does anyone else worry as much as I do?
Investors focused on Greece’s fiscal woes for much of the three months. As agreement on a second bailout package for the troubled country grew more certain, market sentiment and share prices focused on the positive. An infusion of liquidity by the European Central Bank also helped stocks, particularly the financials sector, by ensuring that banks would not run out of cash over the near term. Germany, Europe’s largest economy, was among the better performers with its best first quarter since 1998.
An incredulous Sir Anthony replied: “You are described as the world’s most famous atheist.”
We need help...
Sure there are oodles of skills to learn to be a great leader — and I love diving into those ‘buckets’ — but my message is: we all have a leader within. Own and hone your leadership and you will have a greater chance of leading/living your life by design and not default. Now who wouldn’t want that!?
I've been itching to play along, but mostly I just want to go look at what everyone else has to share that's "garden themed." The snow here's pretty and all, but sometimes, enough is enough.
Called me to dream and co-labor with you
"I not destructor, I J..." (he ripped a book cover off a book, so I called him destructor)
the rest, chalked up to an unnerving sense of invasion. and a breach of trust.
Sep 21, 2011 1,015 Pageviews
PROVERBS 8:13
Loosely cast on 100 stitches. Place marker & join for working in the round being careful not to twist stitches.
As a result of taking down Cecilia, however, Ichika gains yet another girl who takes an interest in him much to Houki’s annoyance since she’s clearly never stopped thinking about him. Then a new transfer student from China arrives, she is Rin Fan who also happens to be a childhood friend since their junior high days. Rin also happens to be in love with Ichika and that fact is obvious from the minute she greets him. However, Rin is rather upset that a totally oblivious Ichika didn’t get the meaning behind a promise he made her a long time ago. As a result, they battle it out using there is when an unidentified rogue IS appears and both Rin and Ichika must work together to stop it.
DISTANCE LEARNING INSTRUCTIONAL DESIGNER for the Skill Up Network (SUN) grant funded program
Nor, is the conflict between the interests of workers and the State restricted to just the Capitalist State. In the early 1920's there was a major dispute between Lenin and Trotsky over the question of the Trades Unions precisely on this question. (see: Lenin - The trade unions,
Lavender
Pattern Suits, with the Laces and Buttons, may be seen at the Admiralty-Office.
Earrings- Matrix Earrings- The Pink Bandaid
Took today off. My 2-year old is cranky and still sick and slept from 6pm last night till 5 this morning. I didn't go to bed last night until after midnight so I am tired. I took the day off and brought her late to the daycare after the * TV episode * this morning.
A year earlier, she lamented a "witch-hunt" against Muslim groups in America. "There is a concerted effort to silence, you know, institution building among Muslims. And the way to do it is malign these groups" such as CAIR and the Islamic Society of North America (ISNA), she told a Religious Newswriters Association conference in Washington.
I won’t lie, it comes in handy. I rarely ever get anti-gay slurs thrown at me. I can stay in the closet in certain situations. I can go out with my girly girls and not stick out like a sore thumb. No one expects me to be able to handle a screw driver.
Chris is a product director at a publisher called Shadow Mountain. Lisa is the Acquisitions Editor there. Shadow Mountain had recently delved into the national fantasy market for middle readers and young adults, finding a lot of success, including the New York Times Bestseller list, paperback sales to Simon & Schuster, movie rights, etc.
Posey Osterhagen is not a hottie. She’s about 107 pounds soaking wet, with a cow-lick that refuses to be tamed, and a complete inability to dress like a girl. This is a slight improvement over her high school self. Now, no need to feel sorry for Posey. She’s a completely happy, business-owning, big dog loving woman who has had a wonderful childhood and is still surrounded by a loving family and group of friends.
My ‘audition’ will be on April 8, and until then, I will be practicing every day, multiple times a day.
Inverted classroom, where first contact with materials students are studying electronically prior to class and come prepared to be engaged in more intense activities. Instructors monitor to determine where students are struggling, so this learning dashboard allows instructors to focus on target areas that need elaboration and reinforcement.
What are the implications that values are “caught not taught”?
And then there's the midden - the garden shed in all it's glory. I should have cleared it before doing anything else. I seem to spend a lot of time wading in looking for things. I noted in passing that Elaine at Rosebank Ramblings seemed to be in the same position with her greenhouse. But Elaine has tidied hers up! I partly put up the photos on this post to shame me into doing something about it.
"We" (ie Bean) drive to Durham - we get drunk with 2 brother watching Star Wars on video.
Are you able to make time for personal stitching?
Ode to an Ancient Stone
Read and annotate chapters 13-15 of The Scarlet Letter. There will be a quiz on Wednesday on chapters 7-15.
A knife, a father's throat had mangled,
Some of our design team members will also be offering prizes on their blogs so be sure to visit each stop along the way and enter your comments.
But compare this with the capture and subsequent trial of former Iraqi dictator Saddam Hussein. Saddam was convicted and executed. By contrast, Gadhafi was murdered in cold blood by a roving band of undisciplined, screaming thugs with AKs and pistols.
born: 1791
This is my first entry - I think I am doing two - and she is just Gorjuss!! The background paper is from My Craft Studio Walk in Wonderland, which I printed twice, once with and once without Gorjuss, and cut out the bubble with her on to decoupage. I put two strips of narrow DST following the lines on the paper, then sprinkled Glamour Dust over it. She, of course, is coloured with ProMarkers, as is the gold brad in the middle of the flower.
It was only later, when we came home that it dawned fully on me, how silly I had been… all the pains and ‘ifs’ came out… what if you were there by yourself, what if it had been Paul, could I have pulled him out? What if he had NOT been able to reach me?
It wasn't long enough, but I'll take what I can get!
Pep Guardiola, as Barcelona head coach, won a major trophy every 18 games. Yep, you may have to read that again. A major trophy every 18 games. He created a squad of world-class players that played with one mentality, keep possession. Your opponents can’t score if they don’t have the ball but what if they do? Easy, Pep told his players they had 6 seconds to get the ball back and more often than not, because of high defensive pressure all over the pitch, they would.
Kind of like everything else, I make it up as I go:
Mr. W. THORNE Does the right hon. Gentleman think that if there was any possible chance of Wells beating Johnson there would have been any talk about the matter?
under a heat wave
But even though I’m no car mechanic, I do know this: I can’t take pieces of my car out of the hood. No, no, no. I can get away with taking out a few things like those little floor carpets or the antennae or glove compartment, but I cannot take things away from under the hood. Big no-no.
The second subject was the Bande à Bonnot, a Belle Epoque anarchist group who were the first ever to use an automobile to escape from the scene of a crime. With the help of mug shots of the gang members and short film sequences on her laptop, Sylvanie de Lutèce rattled off the tale until the final, inevitable, sticky end of the gang.
No arrests have yet been made in the Daffeu killing.
Happy New Year (two weeks later)! How are everyone's New Years Resolutions going? Tired of salads yet? Thinking of giving up on that diet? DON'T! You can do it. This salad keeps it healthy, but packs a big flavor punch. If you want to be even healthier, leave out the prosciutto and goat cheese, it is still really good!
21B. CHRISTMAS/WINTER SPECIALTY SPICED BEER
Laura Munson first became famous for her emotionally-charged essay, Those Aren’t Fighting Words, Dear, which was published in The New York Times Modern Love section. The New York Times site crashed because of the overload of comments the essay brought in. You have to click over and read this essay after you’re done commenting here. It’s … I don’t even have the words to tell you how much of an impact it will have on you. It’s THAT powerful.
Cody decides to make omelets for lunch. Austen is not far behind.
Other markings include: a "Cinelli Equipe" decal on down-tube
“When we started this we didn’t realise we would hit such a nerve with journalists and readers up and down the country.
Back to my point – the gods are many, they are each unique and independent of one another they do not rely on and are largely unaffected by humanity. We cannot alter or influence the gods if they do not wish it, we are not gods, cannot be, will not be.
Of course, the world of health care presents plenty of legitimate hurdles to such connectivity, including privacy and security. And that forms the heart of the dilemma: Physicians, practices and health care organizations generally say that, for those reasons, they can’t engage in e-communications with their patients. But some physicians do, if only on such small matters as appointment reminders. Others go further, by providing Web sites with health tips and wellness information or offering online appointment scheduling.
Apple Cider Vinegar*
Chorus
(Morning Walk — June 7, 1976, Los Angeles)
5) Stay tuned to Yesternight's Voyage this month for a mad treasure hunt (later on) that will connect all the participating blogs.
And the same for your comments on indigenes. You implied that they were savages and infested with fungal diseases, then said you had no beef with them. Case closed. What do they want? A formal apology? Again?
The reason we offer a lower tax rate for investment is that it is good for the economy and society as a whole. Already the tax rate for companies is the highest in the world and the tax rate for investment is the highest in the world so actually we are hurting ourselves when we claim it is not fair for millionaires to pay a lower tax rate. They already paid the higher rate when they actually worked and earned that money now they are only investing it instead of hoarding it like Scrooge McDuck.
The Facebook session focused on three things to do right now to grow your Facebook fan page. All of them were fairly easy, and I have to admit that I need to work on my Facebook page. (You do all at least like my page, right?) And no, I haven't implemented anything since I got back from Blissdom, much to my chagrin. Unfortunately, I've been under the weather since I got back, so I'm lucky just to start getting caught up on laundry!
WHAT THE FUCK IS THAT?
The denim came home with me, and I decided to go ahead and cut out McCall's 6279:
Lost Abbey Judgement Day
The bread itself is quite heavy, by which I mean by weight rather than texture. On average a loaf weighs an amazing 2.5 pounds, over 1.2kg! Despite this, it wasn’t dense, chewy or hard going, but surprisingly soft, moist and springy.
I am not depressed. I may be strung out and have a very short fuse at times, but I am not depressed
The information was corroborated by two independent sources with direct knowledge of Malema’s affairs.
Rifle barrels protruded menacingly from one of these vehicles as motorists scrambled to get out of the way.
But man oh man, if this does catch on, I can't wait to see the trading cards.
There’s loads of choice for the expert panel, how about blowing a load of license fee money on bringing Dame Julie Andrews over. She originally played Eliza and was controversially overlooked for the film when Audrey Hepburn got the role. Having Julie (the original Eliza) would help to dispel the default preference for Audrey lookalikes.
I contemplated one of its many lines.
Method for Lemon Curd Filling
- In Florida, unmarried women who parachute on Sundays can be jailed.
PK-758 Wide Eyed and Bushy Tailed - 1-1/8" Set
and ta-da you got a tubular outfit.
I scheduled a notary to meet me at the hospital today at visiting hours, which starts at 2 pm. I'm going to call over to the hospital at noon to make sure that Mom is in a state where she can deal with this. I've specifically avoided calling the social worker because I can't take another road block.
HP) Having to think about money.
I don't know about you but i have to admit i loathe V-day...yes despicable i know but i do...as a matter of fact i am cringing to have to acknowledge this silly holiday or whatever you call it...but alas...alot of people like so i shall roll with it. :)
The Statue of Liberty stands in Upper New York Bay as an icon to American freedom. Within the context of the United States, for many, New York City stands as a place to chase their dreams and also to exercise freedom to express themselves in any manner they choose without fear of ostracism. Here, New Yorkers are extremely tolerant, even embracing and nurturing eccentricities that elsewhere would be untenable. In the case where behaviors are even technically illegal but benign, laws are often not enforced.
of My eternal essence,
Is embracing fully all of ones desires the “dangerous method”? Carl Jung has a brief encounter with renegade psychologist, Otto Gross (Vincent Cassel), whose own philosophy of life is simply if the mind, heart, or flesh desires it act on it. He says this as one who has impregnated multiple women all of which he has abandoned. In the end, Jung’s relationship with Sabina isn’t freeing, but constricting. The immediate feelings of immense pleasure go away and the affair has ugly, dangerous ramifications on both Sabina and Jung’s life.
Bara no Nai Hanaya
7 pm Karaoke, DP’s Classic Grille, Sheffield. Free, Contact: 256-383-5295
As sushi master, Jiro is virtuoso/maestro and conductor in one - he lives, breaths and dreams about sushi, and how to constantly take it to the next level of perfection. He instructs his team consisting of his eldest son and apprentices as a conductor leads an orchestra - pushing each through endless repetition, with improvements all along the way to be the best at their craft. Directing each to create the perfect experience for their guests, in their 10-seater space, each and every day. Jiro commands the same respect from his diners - no specialty rolls with gimmicky names, dippings or distractions like appetizers are offered here - his pristine sushi is meant to be eaten as soon as it's served, and his unspoken demand of the diner is exacting: focus on your meal. And Japanese food writer Masuhiro Yamamoto describes a meal with Jiro as like a concerto - there is a fluid progression of movements: you start with the classics, and build towards the subtly inventive, inspired cadenza, leading up to a theme with variations for finale. All in under half an hour - because Jiro runs a tight company.
The dynamics of awakening
And these commitments are fairly modest. A Judicial Committee meets regularly to handle complaints about people’s behavior, and people are expected to serve turns on the committee and testify as needed. Also, Sudbury students are typically expected to do periodic cleaning chores. School governance is overseen by a weekly meeting that reviews the work of the Judicial Committee and considers proposals regarding rules and activities that could affect the normal flow of the day (e.g., field trips, parties, visitors). Then there are clerks and committees to whom much of the school’s business is delegated, along with certification (aimed at ensuring safe, responsible use of school equipment) and age-mixing (Sudbury schools are open to ages roughly corresponding to grades K-12).
What Peter needs most, Lord, is not to grow up and become successful in life, getting into the college of his choice, securing a job that pays six figures, getting married, raising well-behaved kids, and retiring comfortably. What he needs most is the salvation that comes only through the life, death and resurrection of your Son. Save him, God! Make him run away from sin and crawl to the foot of the cross in realization that he deserves only hell because of his rebellion against you. Then, please, lift his head to see the glorious hope of the Savior’s face. Wrap him in the righteousness of Jesus so that he will live in the atmosphere of your grace all of his days, and bring him home to heaven to live in the blissful perfection that your full presence provides.
I will have approximately two hours each day to do readings. Any further venues in Europe where speaking or consulting may be required, please give me notice.
Laura remained still, in the armchair next to the door, just watching, carefully.
Standing in front of her mirror, April pulls the brush through her shiny, blond hair. She sees her bed behind her, with its Strawberry Shortcake Dolls arranged neatly on the pillow. Still looking in the mirror, she moves until she sees the poster of Big Bird.
Although he told me...
This is what Zhang Dali, even with his impartial and straightforward display style, is trying to remind us – that there are two histories, a history of the image and its politics and another history, a true history that becomes difficult to know, only able to be hinted at through reconstructed accounts and speculation. It is almost as though the history of the lie is easier to know that the history of the truth when it comes to images.
Without a Word is Jill Kelly's memoir of her marriage to Jim Kelly, specifically as it was affected by having a severely ill/disabled baby. It came unsolicited, and I decided to give it a try. I knew I'd either like it or it wouldn't wow me. It pretty much wowed me. So I'm almost halfway through. I think I will feature a giveaway on Monday at 5 Minutes for Mom.
An $11 million dollar project funded by the Bill and Melinda Gates Foundation and the Coca-Cola Corporation are employing 50,000 Kenyan and Ugandan smallholders to produce fruit for Minute Maid, a subsidiary for Coca-Cola.
And our moods lie captive to the need.
The best thing about the film is its relative subtlety. When Albert fantasizes about finding a love of his own, he doesn’t want to cease dressing as a man or take a man as a lover. He identifies so absolutely as a man that he indulges in dreams of the little hotel maid Helen (Mia Wasikowska) sitting by his fire and darning his socks — oddly retrograde fantasies, considering that Helen’s not going to be anyone’s little wifey, but queer ones nevertheless. But the film takes its audience so seriously that it doesn’t feel the need to explain. Neither does Pariah need to explain why Lee is both gay and masculine-appearing, or why she wants to wear a strap-on dildo to the lesbian bar. These films let us do that work on our own.
One must give the benefit of the doubt that Brett actually believes what he says. He lived in South Africa, and is much more aware than the Western public about the complexity of the ANC movement.
12. New York Knicks
Although it is deplorably and sickening to think that six farm-related murders have already occurred in South Africa during the first month of 2012, one must bear in mind that the January death-count related to violent crimes, is far higher than this figure. If we had to add to this figure the number of other deaths caused by vehicle accidents, for example, then I’m sure it’s safe to declare that the month of January 2012 was a blood-spattered one.
The country sold EUR 764 m of bonds due 31 January 2017, with a yield at 4.752 percent vs 3.565 percent previously, oversubscribed 3.7 times vs 2.7 previously.
College is ending for me, but I still have a lot to say about my experience while I was here. I hope that you will find COACC exciting, entertaining insightful segment.
We actually have chocolate pecan pie left over.
and it was at this time, Slim met her two best friends ..
Am I missing something?
The gas station attendant leaves his nice, warm store behind, and comes out to pump Michelle's gas. He's played by one of the genre greats, Brad Dourif, much to my delight. I wonder if he'll get to kill any rats or possess any dolls in this one?
Zielhuis GA, Langendam MW, Groenewoud JMM. Fecundabiliteit en beroep: een explorerend epidemiologisch onderzoek. Tijdschr Soc Gezondheidsz 1994; 72: 9-15.
First of all let me say THANK YOU to all that took the time to hop with us on Angelica's birthday!
One of the best pieces of advice given to me blogging wise, was from Jeff Bell aka Stonch. "Forget all that moderation and password stuff. You won't get enough spam or nutcases to make it worthwhile and people don't like it." He was right.*
Amandine’s photobooth was entirely different, actually it wasn’t technically a ‘photobooth’ at all any more. She explains:
with you!!!
Attributes: Force 1, Cunning 4, Wealth 3.
(Yes, it is an American site and the amount to pay is shown in dollars but don't worry everything's done for you. International membership automatically grants you membership to the British Isles Region or any other region local to you.)
a single moving veil in one moment
Way back in December I got this in a Glossy Box. This is, as far as I’m aware, only available from the Nouveau Beauty Group website for £14.99. The price seems to place it in the mid range of the mascara market. I certainly wouldn’t pay that much for a high street brand mascara but it’s less extortionate than higher end brands.
Había una vez una pequeña manzanita, que publicó un vídeo de una música que le gustaba en Facebook y me encantó. Aquí está el vídeo en Youtube.
Yesterday had more to do with our little girl. She had a "I can't breathe, because I'm choking" moment Sunday night/Monday morning which scared her and terrified Mom and Dad. After some reading, we think she was choking on her own spit because she's teething, but whatever the reason, it took a long time to calm her down and I felt a need to sleep in after getting very little sleep that night, and therefore, did not blog.
Angus slowly regains consciousness. His family is by his side. There is no panic, no fear. I have never experienced this before. They are just by his side, holding his hand. Such peace. There is no doubt in anybody’s mind that Angus is about to meet the Lord. The helicopter lands and another paramedic jumps out. Caleb, one of the best paramedics I know and trust.
Oh no,
and when wisdom is there to fill it
Aerodynamic Designer (Future Car Project Leader)
RELEASE DATE: June 22, 2012
I think I've developed a pattern. I eat....wait four months....then post the recipe. Nothing else. I stink as a blogger lately. ;-) My sincerest apologies. In my absence please enjoy the forty billion other blogs who actually make an effort. Life has changed around here in the last year....I would never have guessed 365 days ago that I would own a business...and a business that is CRA-ZEEEEE busy. Feel free to check that out if you like....it's fun.
All this and I hadn't even taken a shot. But that was next. Richard had me kneeling (hard on the poor knees on a wooden floor) with my left foot forward. “The left arm is out for balance, now swing the ball back and release it forward with the thumb at 10 or 11 o'clock. Aim for the second arrow, and don't forget the follow through.” Getting the hang of this 10 or 11 o'clock business was a lot harder than it sounded. Next we tried the one step drill, standing up. “The left knee has to be bent, and you slide into the shot with the right foot skewed behind to keep balance.” I also had to remember what to do with my hands and feet. How could I remember all that?
Welcome to the June Blog Hop! If you haven't started from the beginning, then click HERE to do that. There ARE a couple of surprises along the way! (wink, wink) You'll also get to check out the two brand new MFT Sweet Sixteen members, Barbara and Kathy. Oh, and remember that both of the sets that you will see/have seen on this Hop will be available at midnight tonight!
There are rules which, in my opinion, could be stricter, but I'm a hard woman to please. I love the countryside with a passion and want to protect it, and I'm sure the visitors who grace its environment are lovers of the countryside, too. People spend money in the countryside; apart from farming, tourism is a massive industry that keeps people in work and assists in giving holiday makers a memorable time. The area in which I live is no exception. We rely heavily on the tourism industry to help our economy and it's wonderful to see people enjoying the fresh air and the surrounding area, watching children have a fabulous time and seeing dogs being given their much needed exercise.
The story of this remarkable meeting between faiths and cultures goes back several years, when Radha Vallabha Dasa of ISKCON New York, who is currently working on a documentary on spiritual activism, envisioned a public conversation between Cornel West and the late ISKCON guru Bhakti Tirtha Swami. It made sense: Radha Vallabha admired both, they were both from the same generation, they were both from African American backgrounds and had similar experiences growing up, and they were both influential spiritual leaders.
So this is our fence along the driveway. We put up trellises every year. I planted sweet pea vines a week ago. They have popped up and started. I filled the baskets with pink and purple flowers.plants and vines.
Off to Kyoto (after sneaking tomorrow’s plastic trash into a neighboring apartment’s trash cage)!! Non-burnables, mostly plastic trays, styrophoam (sorry Jake) and cling wrap, are only collected twice a month but they mount up so quickly I couldn’t miss the chance to get rid of it!
but it appears that all that has been taken was excess
On the Danish transmission we don't get commercials, but rather 3 specialists, they call themselves. They analyse the show and winners.
Considering all the insanity occuring in the world right now and always, my piddly shit is nothing. I know this, which is why I never allow a pity party go on for too long. Being appreciative feels a whole lot better than whining like a little bitch – thank you, El Capitan Obvious, but always good to acknowledge. I feel better already, just writing it.
A serving of fruit and a whole grain. Why this dessert could be considered a health food!
I just love Paper Sundaes Challenges and would love a chance to be on their design team so I thought I would give it a shot!! Here are the cards I decided to post for the DT call. Good luck to all who enter!
Spotify Update Brings Pandora-Like Radio Stations – As expected, Spotify on Friday began rolling out a new version of its desktop software for Windows and Mac, adding several new features, including Pandora-like radio stations. Spotify version 0.8.3 allows users to create radio stations based on a particular playlist or album. Users can start a new radio channel from any playlist or album to listen to similar songs. The update also brings a new Instant Search feature that immediately displays search results.
Firstly, peer pressure is not a teen thing. Peer pressure exists among adults, too. The pressure to have the best job, a good spouse, 2.5 kids, etc. Even on a micro level, to do/have certain things that other people in your field do/have.
When I ended the relationship with my ex, the Tina stuff barely had anything to do with it. It was just the tip of the ugly, deceitful, heartbreaking iceberg.
in a pot on the stove & set it on low for about 30 to 45 minutes while I cleaned my house!
Please for the love of God and all things good, PUH-LEEEEEZ!!!…. let me have the rest of my Friday be a REAL Friday, and not a Monday in disguise as a Friday. Because you are so NOT good at going incognito, Monday. I may be going insane because of three kids. But I KNOW for a fact that you are to NOT be here again for another 3 days.
ABV: ???? My guess is around 9 to 10%
is rendered by Hunt as:
today her friend eli asked her, "what is deaf?" and m said, "i'm deaf. when i was born i was born deaf and my ears can't hear and all the kids at my school are deaf and they wear implants or hearing aids like me."
And since I'm so caught up in the story I'm writing, you get a short post today. Sorry guys.
TD Banknorth Garden
Carmen and Done are really good friends and together they have faith for anything: small or great! A while back they were walking in the Somerset Mall together, and at one point arranged to go separate ways for a while.
Having said that, he feels Yoseikan might die a slow death, but will reguvenate as someone else discovers it at a later time. Apparently many students are too closely connected to the teacher rather than the art. In the case of Mochizuki sensei, so called loyal students who loved him and attended faithfully when he was alive, turned away, never to return to the dojo in Shizuoka after he died.
What Are Little Girls Made Of/ Miri/Balance of Terror/Shore Leave/The Galileo Seven/The Squire of Gothos/Arena/Tomorrow is Yesterday/Court Martial/The Return of the Archons/This Side of Paradise/Errand of Mercy/The Alternative Factor/The City on the Edge of Forever/The Changeling/Mirror Mirror/The Trouble with Tribbles/The Ultimate Computer/Bread and Circuses/And the Children Shall Lead
I made no big deal about the test. I didn't make any effort to prepare her or tell her why we were taking the test, other than it might help us decide if we would be homeschooling again next year or not. that's all. No stress. No "GOOD LUCK", no "DO YOUR BEST", no "GO GETTEM TIGER". Nothing like that. She calmly followed the staff into the testing room with a quick smile and a wave over her shoulder as she went. OF course, I was barred from the testing room. Heaven forbid she have any family support.
3. Pass the potatoes through a potato ricer and into a bowl.
Here comes the role strain.
Myth #4 – Introverts don’t like people.
This week’s Flower Soft Sprinkle Challenge (FSC16) – Think Snow!
My husband and I lived in London for a few years so, believe me, I know what I'm missing when it comes to a northern hemisphere Christmas. There's a certain magic about crisp winter evenings, streets strewn with twinkling lights, and chestnuts roasting on every city corner that we simply can't replicate in December, Down Under, hence the ever increasing popularity of the Christmas in July festivities here.
And did those feet in ancient time
At trial, the prosecution called an eye witness to the robbery and shooting, who gave her account of events. The prosecution also introduced confessions from both Petitioner and Dodson.3 After the prosecution rested, both defendants invoked their constitutional right not to testify. The only witness called by either defendant was Dr. Rustico Dizon Garcia, a forensic psychiatrist, who had examined Dodson. Although he was called on Dodson’s behalf, the doctor testified that he had no opinion as to whether Dodson was legally sane, or insane, at the time of the robbery and murder.
Karan located an image of Raja Vikramaditya which I bowed to .. but did not feel was quite right. Not the right place. He then did some more locating and found a place near the lake between Mahakaleshwar and Hari Siddhi Mandir where there was a temple to Vikramaditya. This was the very place I was looking for and waiting to see for so long. I knew it was right as soon as I entered the place. After bowing to Durga Devi and admiring the pictures of the navaratnas of Raja Vikramaditya’s court and bowing to the Guru who had located this place after his narmada parikrama, I finally bowed to Raja Vikramaditya.
Millions of people worldwide are waking up to the fact that they are going to have a blog — no ifs, ands, or buts. That a blog — a personal marketing and communications device — is no longer a luxury. If you expect to stay on the cutting edge of the ‘net, you’re going to be a blog publisher, or else.
I pour out the earth of my mind filled with stones
13. Up In The Air
I had no previous knowledge that this cognitively impaired woman with a limited future lifespan was having such extensive dental surgery. There is much controversy about whether an individual with a prosthetic knee replacement even needs antibiotic prophylaxis with an antibiotic notorious for causing GI distress. There were additionally concerns on my part about the choice of a codeine based narcotic for pain control based on her existing medication list.
Actually, thinking about it, if I go onto Birdsnest.com.au and buy one item from Corporate Mummy, one from Party Granny and one from Playful Active that should come close to my personality today. Then I’ll wear my cut-downs with thongs and a blazer for the office tomorrow because I simply cant find any retailers offering a personality section for ‘Fruitloop Freelancer’.
Poultry also provides iron with a high degree of bioavailability, meaning your body can easily reap its benefits.
Phreak: What? How?
How Can You Improve Your Home?
I also found out about a cool blog called Just Buggin' that has Cricut challenges so I decided to enter my Santa & Sleigh. The challenge (Challenge # 11) is to create something using an animal Cricut cartridge. I think my "Rudolph" fits in to an animal.
1 1/2 teaspoon of cinnamon powder
It is not comparable to the Award glut nowadays. The reason why an Award is given has no connection to a real merit anymore. The main reasons for Awards today are – a reward or return service for booked advertisement space, for booked floor space at exhibitions for getting famous people for promotion or to attract the press and to deliver the right pictures.
Remember Mitchell Graham--real name Mitchell Gross--the writer who set up a fake writing contest in order to promote his debut fantasy novel, and later on--much later--turned out to be a serial con artist? (Victoria blogged about Mitchell a few weeks ago, in connection with his indictment on charges of wire fraud and money laundering for allegedly luring a woman into investing millions of dollars in a phony company.)
I will be the first to tell you that I hate remodeling. Mostly because I hate things being in chaos and it would eventually lead to not having a bathroom in the middle of winter. Utah winters in the past were not kind. You would sometimes have to plow a walkway to the car through 3-4 feet of snow. This year it has been 3-4 inches.
Make the sugar syrup buy putting sugar and water together and allow to boil for about 5 minutes creating a sugar syrup. I think I am going to remove the zest at this point, but I am not sure.
Private medical firms include such treatments with health cash plans and the NHS was thought to spend around £4 million on homeopathy. The British Medical Association (BMA) has urged NHS trusts to stop including this type of treatment in their budgets and instead turn to more clinically-proven forms of treatment.
It stresses me out a lot – even when I am not home. When everything is messy and out of order it makes me feel like my brain is messy and out of order.
Hear me tell you I…forgive.
1 religious
You can hear the angels sing
Thursdays after 6pm - $12 ribs
I took the time to go for a little walk around the site and it’s great to see some of the wonderful plots, It’s amazing just how much the place has changed since early March. Every plot has it’s own personality and you’d be amazed at how many ideas you’ll get and how many people you’ll get chatting to if you walk around. Gardeners seem to be the friendliest bunch, always happy to share some advice, or ask for some when it’s needed. It really is a great community. There was a gazebo on site the other day where they were selling plug plants, they had a great selection, including some unusual varieties. There’s such a great set up on site, the allotment shop has a great selection of all things garden related and the best thing is, all the proceeds go to the Epilepsy Care Foundation so it’s worth buying on site, when possible. You can even buy your shed and they will install it for you. I’m a particular fan of the tea/coffee van that visits every weekend, and last weekend, I spotted an ice cream van on site with a queue of allotmenteers lining up like kids to get their 99′s. I think I’ll stick to my cups of tea for now though, there’s still quite a chill in the air.
Chris H.
I’ve had worse deadlines. I could afford a long bath in our whirlpool tub and a good meal first.
the metallic spray paint is really quite fabulous.
WAU- We all understand
Tiger Okoshi (Main Performer), Mike Stern (Guitar),
We can only measure to discover how much and where.
There are many ways to insult someone’s intelligence. My personal favorite is to answer a dumb question with a lie. Not a sarcastic answer, a total fabrication of truth. I like to see how long it takes for this person to find out the truth. I know that when they do, they will remember the lie I told them, and that is where my gratification comes in. This is, of course, only if I don’t like the person asking the dumb question. It’s never good to lie, unless you really don’t like the person you’re lying to. Then it is only moderately unacceptable.
Level 3 - Triple Layer Chocolate Cake - Buy 11 Get 3 Free
For the rest of this sharing, the only thing that matters is the love of Self. I will not be talking about any exterior sort of love… because that too, is simply illusion.
Never forget, whether you feel like you're sitting on tip of the world or thought the bottom has dropped out of everything, I love you and I care!!!
Man fears man as the chief captain feared the human might of Rome. But it is God that wields the wrath of eternal judgment. We see something of this in Hebrews 9:27.
(2010; Shahrukh Khan, Kajol, Jimmy Shergill, Sonya Jehan; directed by Karan Johar)
I recently finished up a large hospitality project, and I used a contrasting sheer against a light drapery panel and it looked awesome. So I decided to do the same thing in my living room. I found a brown linen with a pattern embroidered on it with twine.
Thank you for calling us to follow You LORD. The path of a disciple is the decision of humble obedience. You can use anyone and yet You have chosen us to be ministers of reconciliation. Help us today to hear Your voice and choose Your purpose above our pursuits. Empower us by Your Holy Spirit to respond as Philip did and follow You with a passion to proclaim You to others. Amen
I am such a bad blogger. It's been way too long since I've written a post. I have been busy though and not just slacking. I have been updating my studio - again, working on dolls and paintings and just life stuff in general.
What a great way to start off the new year! Since My Dreamy Start to 2012 fell through, I decided to spend the day out at the Alameda Point Antiques Faire to do a little treasure hunting. I think it had been almost a year since my last visit, so I took my time and spent almost seven hours walking, shopping, visiting with friends, and eating....a lot of eating.
1 PM Saturday. Last night I was to perform for a room full of grumpy old Jews in Exeter, south Devon. I expected to face sour, smug faces filled with resentment and bitterness of a people who weren’t living where they thought they belonged – in New York or at the very least, north London – and with no respect for me for having been crazy to leave New York and not successful enough for them to have heard of me.
It is fitting that my first review is of Wasatch Beer's Apricot Hefeweizen. It is fitting because many nights when I decide to knock a few back, its this beer that leads the way. The reason is for all of its tastiness, I cannot drink too much of it.
Freudian slip - which has been mocked with the term a 'Freudian slit' or 'what do you call a psychiatrist's petticoat?'
Is it morally wrong to kill people? Not really, argue two eminent American bioethicists in an early online article in the Journal of Medical Ethics. Walter Sinnott-Armstrong, of Duke University, and Franklin G. Miller, of the National Institutes of Health believe that “killing by itself is not morally wrong, although it is still morally wrong to cause total disability”. Skipping ahead to the money quotes:
My lovely wife always tells me,"don't care about them lah" but sometimes I always feel if I don't caution them,the next victim could be my friend,my friend's friend or my friends' children but now to think about it I am no Superhero lah.
Now, more than ever, educators have an opportunity to realize Freire’s vision. By teaching well with digital technologies, faculty can help students connect, collaborate, and create, allowing them to take ownership of their own learning.
Napoleon started spreading lies about Snowball blaming him for everything that went wrong on the farm. When the other animals would question this, they were put down and isolated from the group until they agreed to believe the lies. Eventually, a pack of wild dogs attacked Snowball and drove him away once and for all. From that day forth, when anything broke on the farm or the benefits weren’t trickling down to the animals, it was blamed on Snowball. He was still creating havoc to ruin everything—or so the animals were told.
A. StoryMineMedia is a visual storytelling company. We come from a photojournalism background with a focus on documentary-style video stories. We produce independent projects — stories we are passionate about, and are not necessarily getting paid to tell. And through those projects, hope to attract clients who like our style and see the value of using stories to communicate their message.
I DO! Especially in my romance fiction. There is something so naughty and exciting about a game of truth and dare...or a riveting round of strip poker.
Within 5-7 days, the blisters will dry and scab over and are usually gone within 2-4 weeks. For 4 out of 5 people, they get better without complications. Approximately 1 in 5 people will develop pain which can continue for months or even years after the rash resolves. This condition which we call neuralgia can be debilitating and restrict a person’s quality of life. Rarely, serious complications can occur such as skin infections or scarring, pneumonia, hearing problems, blindness, brain and nerve problems and rarely, death.
Inside sentiment: Not only do you have the best mother-in-law in the world, but you share a birthday with some pretty famous people. (This is a reference to the fact that he shares a birthday with my Mom.) LOL.
Roles are reversed from a traditional tower-defense standpoint, with the aliens defending and the player and his or her team trying to survive the onslaught and delve deeper into the wreckage. Hence, why it is called tower offense.
Katie Puckrik, an eloquent perfume reviewer on YouTube explains how Musc Ravageur is legendary as a ‘man-catcher’ and ‘bird-snatcher’: it makes men come on all wolfish but has women feeling 'Hello Kitty'. From my own sniffs, I agree with her that it has a ‘soft warm monkey business vibe’ infused with a ‘delicious animalic muskiness’. Nevertheless, at £90 a bottle, it was a bit expensive as a writer’s self-gift. So I contented myself with a deep sniff and a little tranche of impregnated cardboard for the Talina research file.
Transgression would also arise if a nation was attacked without first calling them to Islam. Muslims are ordained to call their enemies to Islam before fighting against them. If they refuse, Muslims should call them again to pay Jizya and submit to the laws of Allah (Subhanahu Wa ta’ala). If the enemy refuses again, Muslims should fight them in order that there be no persecution, and the Deen should be for Allah alone. This procedure should be observed, otherwise the limits have been transgressed and, “Allah verily loves not transgressors.”
(We’d passed the canal just before parking; I was able to take a drive-by shot…
I could fight to go back to sleep.
I signed on and besides ink ordered toilet paper, paper towels and other things I can’t live/work without.
"My beautiful, beautiful grandma."
Are you in the habit of forgetting people’s names – pin codes – passwords – telephone numbers or even house numbers? The good news is that now there are several ways to improve your memory. Healthy Living Can Improve Your Memory!
Okay fooligans, here's the scoop. I'm going to try a writing schedule. I'll alternate weeks, 1 week with posts on Monday, Wednesday, and Friday, and 1 week with posts on Tuesday and Thursday. That way, I'm motivating myself to write and keeping the creative juices flowing. Juices. That is a weird word.
The first two images are my creations using a combination of my photography and digital files from my shop. The sky is the limit...only your imagination limits what you can do with these you print digital files. They are all copyright free and can be altered and cropped to suit your project.
The saving grace was the dessert which was a chocolate and Oreo brownie with coffee ice cream and hot fudge. It was pretty damn good on its own, but what sent it through the stratosphere was the name of it – The Chuck Norris.
But one old man did whisper true,
I figured this would be the opportune time to start my newest weekly blog that will highlight and rank Wyoming’s eight NJCAA Division I men’s basketball teams. The hardwood has been full of excitement through about the first third of the Wyoming college hoops season and this week’s rankings indicate just how close a handful of teams are at the top. There are currently five (more than half) teams in the Cowboy State’s junior college ranks that have already hit double-digits in the win column. And if those teams can stay hot, this may just be one of the most exiting years in Wyoming junior college basketball.
The latest family gossip
Walker made Ten High Bourbon at its Illinois plant. That brand is now made by the Sazerac owned Barton distillery. (Here's a review of Ten High from the pre-Sazerac Barton distillery). Ten High was, and continues to be a budget brand; they distillery also made Walker's Deluxe.
Does Painer apply? Painer was considering the "own intellectual creation" standard for European Law, but common law protection is, arguably, lower (I'd say - almost indisputably).
Listen, time passes.
By six thirty we were both damp and freezing, so we headed back. Ari revealed she’d never seen the BBC show ”Sherlock” which is basically a crime if you’ve been living in London for the past three months. We talked happily of grabbing my blanket and cuddling while watching an episode or two.
I’ll have yr. crucial kisses/
So Many Scallops w N.M $6.00
38 Right-click on the letter button movie clip and select Linkage from the menu.
When I finally found out I was having Maya (a name I had picked out before I even had any children), I was beyond excited. Over the moon. And then when she was born, I remember marveling at how exquisitely female she was. How petite and perfectly formed were her eyelashes, her chubby nose and her full lips. She was so different from her brothers that it instantly quelled the nature vs. nurture debate that I learned in college. No one had to teach her how to be feminine. It was all wrapped up in her being.
Genre Appeal: (7/10) – Lockout works as a lightweight action movie, not really demanding a whole lot out of the viewer, and it’s good to enjoy if you just want something breezy and fun that you don’t have to take seriously. It’s nothing new as far as action movies go, and it’s remarkably simplistic for a sci-fi movie, but if you just want cheesy good fun, this fits the bill.
“Not for a long time.”
To those who drop a line
A few of the things I love about the salon:
Breckenridge Brewery & Pub Agave Wheat
Git - Just an insult.
We've spent the last few weeks prepping the garden for planting, including mulching the rows with wood chips. We lined them with empty feed bags to keep the weeds down, and piled the wood chips on top. It's a little thing, but it makes the garden feel so much nicer. We're going to build a long, narrow chicken run along the back fence as well. Nothing grows that close to the alders anyway, and I'm hoping the birds will keep the forest from encroaching on our little veggie plot.
I somehow managed to figure my way into a sitting position, feeling something like a floating genie, and spied a very old woman, creaking away in an equally-floating rocking chair, serenely knitting a blanket. "Grandma... Rachel?" I asked. Grandma Rachel had been dead for 20 years. This was most definitely a dream, no doubt brought on by all the cold medicine I had taken the night before.
No wonder they are still so heedless of other people's rights and desires. "We know what's best for you". Or "Gemeinnutz vor Eigennutz" as Hitler put it
Come on TA!!!
“Anybody who has been in my classroom could tell you how much I love teaching and how much I love these students, and that should be what matters more than anything in my past,” she said in May 2006.
Since we had so much rain this month, I only got Cole across the river 4 or 5 times. That meant that I had plenty of time to work him on the hill. To start with, I continued to work with him in the arena or walk him up and down the driveway for a few minutes before putting him in his stall after coming up the hill.
So here is my 1st layout with a school pic of my sweet lil' one ...ANISHA...its good to start with a picture taken by a professional!
I have also started assembling a Revell Sopwith Triplane for myself. It's wretched.Worse than the Airfix models (so far) to a similar degree that the Eduard model is better. I have a couple more Revell waiting to be built -- I hope they're not all like this.
Even if I have the main plot thought out as I get to know my characters (quirks, likes, dislikes, appearance, etc.) They will breathe further life into the story as I find out about their own backgrounds and how some of the pieces of their past directly affect how they deal with the unfolding situation they find themselves in. There are times when I’ll find myself boxed in with the storyline like scene that I have no idea where to go with next. Or perhaps I’ve just closed out a scene and I just can’t decide where to go next with the story. I of course know that long-term goal, but the intermediate scenes need more and I have to give the characters something else to do that will be relevant. On these occasions, I’ll go someplace to muse and think.
Harry was hailed as a hero by the American public, rather than a homicidal maniac. People admired the husband who stood up for his wife. They cheered him on during his trial, which was splashed all over the newspapers. It was all everyone could talk about.
Difficulties ...
The layout is Karen's Sweet Sunday Sketch. I took inspiration from her card and ruffled up my ribbon. The puppy, stamped butterfly, and sentiment are from my Penny Black Critter Party set (yes, I love this set and use it a lot....especially that birthday sentiment...hope you're not sick of seeing it). The main image is up on foam tape and Stickles were added for some pretty sparkle. The card measures 4" square.
“I’m here on behalf… no, perhaps I should start more simply. Mr. Doyle, are you acquainted with the scope of the universe?”
Things were looking good, and in May 1981, Woodham Brothers sold the locomotive to Procor (UK) Ltd in Wakefield, and she left as the 125th departure from Barry. After its departure from Woodham Brothers, it took 30 rail enthusiast volunteers 16 to completely rebuild and restore the 5972 to here original, Great Western glory. During this time, new flues and fire brick had to be installed, all the controls and gauges replaced, new driving rods installed and new super heater equipment installed. The 5972 was one of the most complete engines to depart Woodham Brothers, so rebuilding costs were manageable. The GWR 5972 “Olton Hall” debuted to the public as an operating steam locomotive sometime in 1997.
13 A Crime
and I can not sew it up,
Now, four fun writing contests that are happening right now!! And, none of them have an entry fee!
I went to bed, relatively early, with a planned 0300 start to my shift, but a bit after midnight I was awake with the pain from my wrist. I'd hoped it would settle and I'd be able to drive, but no, this was serious. No strength in my grasp and if I held my hand the wrong way or bumped my wrist, the pain would make me gasp.
~If you are interested in trading product in exchange for advertising, please contact me. Something can be worked out, usually, if the items can be reviewed on my channel, included in a giveaway, or used by me personally.
Yes...there are more new sea creatures ready and waiting for paper...soo....off I go!!! Gotta be ready to jazz up the galleries walls with new and wonderful art.
there are intentional moments of song, those moments of thanks and joy for the privilege to live this life God has given me. but, other times, i'm caught off guard, like a kid humming in class too many times, finally called out by the teacher.
The web’s emphasis on list-making has been well documented on the content side. Mashable‘s entire M.O. is to present content as numbered lists (preferably odd numbers). Or should I say, in their article “The Top 7 Ways for Mashable to Present Content,” list-making is #1. They admitted as much in a tongue-in-cheek article a few years back where they outlined how their writers gamed the system.
2 The aim of all political association is the preservation of the natural and imprescriptible rights of man. These rights are liberty, property, security, and resistance to oppression.
Glued to my seat and my wine
A series for younger readers, “I See the Sun”, is a great way to introduce early readers, five to seven years, to the world. The second addition is I See the Sun in Nepal written by Dedie King and illustrated by Judith Inglese ($12.95, Satya House Publications, Hardwick, MA, softcover) It is bilingual, written in English and Nepalese, and it portrays the essential cultural elements of Nepal through the eyes of a child. It is an excellent way to introduce a child to the way the world is made up of different nations, cultures, languages, and such. Coming in 2011 are others in the series devoted to Afghanistan, Russia, and India. The exotic State of Hawaii is the setting for Aloha, Kanani by Lisa Yee ($6.95, American Girl, softcover) that debuted in January, kicking off American Girl’s 25th birthday celebration. Kanani Akina is the 2011 Girl of the Year. She is a warm and cheerful girl, blessed to grow up in Hawaii and sharing the “aloha spirit.” Girls from the middle to later years of elementary school will enjoy this one as Kanani welcomes her cousin from New York, helps to rescue a baby Hawaiian monk seal, or assists older people in her community. Also on the same them from American Girl, is Lend a Hand: Girl-Sized Ways of Helping Others ($9.95, softcover) that offers all kinds of ways to help friends, family, animals, and neighbors for the pre-teen set. You can learn more about it and other titles at www.americangirl.com.
We will know.
Kuntī brings her address to a close with this stunning spontaneous composition.
As the three grew, Larry couldn’t live in comfort knowing that his father has maybe or maybe not survived the battle against the Garden Gnomes. Until one day, a letter came along by Owl, and enclosed in the letter was a golden bracelet which he had to go to the country of Saddam-a-mort to throw into the burning oil wells and destroy. Upon the destruction of this bracelet, the wars of Central Earth would cease, and all the people that are wired by their heads into every outlet in the Pink Flamingos power lines will be freed and allowed to live as normal men of Central Earth, instead of living as a ‘renewable energy source.’
TURKUAZ
And look at her now...
When we first moved in, I worked on Ella's room. It is a much bigger space than her old room so I needed to go to Level 1. I headed straight to Jo-ann's to do so. The home section there is very small, but you can get some neat finds on the cheap. I also knew that Ella's room had a garden fairy vibe so I hit the outdoor and spring section of Jo-ann's. Outdoor garden items make for adorable decorations. Here are some of the details:
This is not friendship. This is people putting up with someone they don’t want around who they know won’t come around if they act like this.
We're still hurting, a well of grief and anger. I am so tired of all this bad luck. There's a limit even for me.
Something funny about this guy is that he told us few time ago he was gonna marry. Daisy told me that for sure there was an ‘engagement kid’ instead of an ‘engagement ring’ besides all this. My answer was ‘maybe they are truly in love’ but this time Daisy was right ))))))
Hopefully your boiling rage at my desertion will subside someday. I would rather enjoy sharing old tales over a mug of ale like we used to. Again, I appreciate the opportunities I have been given here, and wish you much success in the future.
I really liked the way these eye crayons went on; very smooth - gliding on like a dream. They blend out nicely, and once they set they're pretty long lasting.
It has been my observation that Christians who adopt the label of Messianic identify more with the tenets of Judaism than they do with the tenets of Christianity. Many reject the label of Christian altogether and some eventually even convert to Judaism.
-After you repent about lying, do you still feel bad? Or do you trust that God really forgave you?
Print on card stock.
Of white marble.
My life is a hundred times better now. I'm no longer spending a minimum of 70 minutes per day traveling in the car. That's 350 minutes a week, which gives me almost 6 hours a week--24 hours a month--of "Linda time." And because I no longer have to get up at 6:15 a.m. to start the lengthy beautification process to make myself presentable to the world, I don't have to go to bed so damn early. I gain time there as well.
Final Price:$.80 ea wyb 3 after coupon
I’ve always disliked the mantra that you could die tomorrow so live for today, because it makes people not consider consequences and it leads to lonely, small and selfish people. But doing too much to aid the advent of tomorrow is equally poor planning and worrying about whether or not you’re doing enough can undermine the intended effect through stress.
We got to the start early enough that there wasn't a big crowd and I was able to use the toilet and warm up a bit before jumping into my corral. The corrals filled up almost immediately and were more crowded than any race corral I've ever been in. I could count the women around me on one hand and as we crossed the start, we headed out to take the streets of Madrid.
for your support
University of Notre Dame.
I have no idea why they invited me to join them--or maybe I invited myself because that sounds like something I would do--but I'll tell you this, those women taught me more about mothering than any book ever could because between them they had, oh I don't know, a hundred million years of parenting experience and it doesn't get more real than that. Each of them was vivacious and dynamic and interestingly, we met for lunch at a place called, "Smoky Davis" famous for its smoked meat sandwiches.
Thanks again very much to Jay for taking this journey with me–and, in fact, for being the reason that the journey was undertaken!–and for providing all of these wonderful photos (and more!).
A report prepared by the eight-nation Arctic Council released on Monday said, the rising global demand for oil and gas is increasing the activity in the Arctic. The increased activity will enhance the risk of oil spills in the region.
All, I will point out again, in March.
To marrow. To marrow. I love you. Oh marrow.
By simply placing an individual coded CQ badge on your website, blog, or other resources, you can earn credits for orders that are placed through your badge.
She is trying but the canyon’s ever widening
But Le Corbeau ain’t just any old film. This taut, tightly wound 91m film is a despairing and morally complex look at the things that damaged people living in a dangerous time will do. That it is a thinly-veiled examination of the many difficulties of living in Vichy France is the common wisdom today, though that allegorical aspect of the film seems to have initially slipped past the folks at Continental-Film who okayed the film and the censors who allowed its release. So there’s some interesting meta-criticism going on w/r/t the film, in that folks wonder about the morality of taking money from the Nazis, while making a final product that is essentially anti-Nazi. ‘Tis a real head scratcher, that one. But, in the end, for any film of this sort to succeed, it must work at both literal AND allegorical level, and Le Corbeau most certainly does that.
And the second thing is that a couple of people have contacted me to say that they are judges for the folk awards and were very happy to see my blog posts. So I was thinking that if there are any other judges out there who'd like to "out" themselves in the name of transparency - since the BBC and Smooth Operations agree that there has never been anything preventing them from doing this - you could email me here and if there is a decent sized handful I could write a separate post about what the folk awards look like from that point of view.
For most of the Silver Age, DC did not include credits for their stories (although it was not uncommon for artists to sign their work). Indeed, probably the most common credit given was fictitious; the one that identified most Batman stories as being drawn by Bob Kane.
Today we had a little retirement party for my favorite teacher of all time. As one of several former students on the faculty at My Small Town High School, I was requested to offer a little speech to commemorate what she had meant to me.
I asked Santa for a copy of Rocky Horror that Christmas, and he obliged. The cassette was displayed on the mantle above my stocking on Christmas morning, alongside my sister's copy of Heathers. And I sat and I watched it, several times over several weeks. I had a very merry Christmas and a happy New Year.
Not surprisingly, any of Jane Austen’s novels. They have all the magic ingredients of timeless romantic comedy – brilliant plotting, characters we care passionately about, wit and laugh-out-loud humour. And, for me, her attention to language means that I can read her books over and over again, even though I know them so well.
God: “Blessed Be, my Lord / The rite is done, our celebration has reached its end / With great love in my heart you remain / Abundant of energy you sustain / Thank you loving God of happiness and light / I bid thee farewell / Merry Meet, Merry Part, Merry Meet Again / So Mote it Be. (say farewell to each individual goddess”
I already know the response to my criticism but here it goes: Almondine’s pain au chocolat is delicious. Superb, even. Light, flakey pastry, slightly browned and crunchy at the ends. Chewy and moist, it tastes like it was only moments ago pulled from the oven.
However, and sorry to put a bit of dampener on this great beery moment, if I had to say one thing though, it's that a lot of the brewery's descriptions seriously let them down. I swear to god, some of the entry forms had 'bottled beer' or simply 'beer' on them!! Really chaps, if I was writing a report card it would say 'must do better' in big red letters!
14And I looked, and behold a white cloud, and upon the cloud one sat like unto the Son of man, having on his head a golden crown, and in his hand a sharp sickle.
Follow me on Twitter: @Fozzy_MGW
Handmade knit striped scarf is made of best quality kid mohair yarn.This supersoft silky touch , delicate scarf is a must for your wardrobe.This would make the perfect gift for any occasion...You will never feel the weight!
9So Joshua, having come up from Gilgal all night, made a sudden attack on them.
How's that for alliteration? If you read my blog last week, you'll know that it was my first week at my graduate job! It was nerve-wracking, confusing and overwhelming, but really really exciting too. I wasn't given too many tips or restrictions when it comes to attire, with my boss simply stipulating 'it would probably be best to dress how you would for a job interview', but I played it really safe my first week. The first day my makeup was incredibly neutral (and disgusting, I pretty much sweated it all off before I got there because of nerves) and I got a little more adventurous as the week went on. I took cues from the other girl who works there (there are only 2 other people on our team), since she seems to be into makeup too.
Eleesha gave an amazing answer from her automatic-writing to “What Does Get GLOWING mean to you?” at the show’s start. Here’s a short snippet to whet your appetite:
“Someone once asked William Barclay how he had become such a prolific writer. The key, he said, is learning to apply the seat of your pants to the seat of your chair.
Vanessa & a friend are on their way to spend the day!
Clinton Davis, 38, New York, N.Y.
It was intimidating and challenging at the same time to do this character, who was originally created by "you know who".
1 revised
Pharmacists should be as well versed at recommending these alternatives as they are at recommending drug therapy. When possible, less medication is always best.
I actually do have the boyfriend with a talent for photography that is every fashion blogger's dream but as he’s a very busy man I almost always do my own outfit shots. I just can’t bring myself (or have time) to prance around London with a tripod, camera and remote to take forty photos of myself posing like a model as I find it cringingly embarrassing. I'd rather take photos in the privacy of my own home but don’t have a spot I'm happy with to get the images I want. I dislike images produced with flash photography which limits when I can take photos as there is often not enough natural light in cloudy old London even when I go outside.
Here is a card I made to have on hand for Thanksgiving!
1 1/2 teaspoons dried crushed red pepper
Of course, I hate this industrial litter. It's vile. Disgusting. Poisonous. But it's also fascinating, and maybe a little inspiring. They could be remnants of a lost underwater civilization. A litterbug Atlantis. They could be space trash that has fallen into the ocean and washed up on our shores. Maybe these elements rust so quickly because they are made of Terbinium and thus only adapted to the atmosphere of Mars.
Never once did I allow my characters to be truly humiliated or embarrassed by their own actions. Why? Because I was afraid they might embarrass me. And that was not okay.
It sounds like the same old assimilationist rubbish that hasn't worked and can't work. Immigrants from anywhere in the world and any race are fine as long as they adopt "British culture"? What British culture is left to assimilate to in places like London, where half the population is from Timbuktu and Pakistan?
It means that, as violently angry as people become when any boundaries of sex are brought up . . I have to stand by them. I can’t endorse homosexuality, because the Bible says it’s wrong. People may hate me all they want, but that wasn’t my decision to make. My decision to make–and I am responsible for this one–is to choose who I will serve. And I have chosen. And the King I follow says homosexuality is wrong. But that’s not all, although it seems to be the one people most remember. Pornography, sex outside of marriage, rape, crude language–all are wrong to God. And so all are wrong to me.
Pray for the team returning. They are in the middle of a thirty-hour odyssey as they come home. Ask God to help them adjust to our time zone, adapt to what has happened here, and to try to share what God has done in them with passion, grace, and tact.
a hint of ripple
Some others
And I drove home that night and laid awake for awhile because I knew I was in trouble with the shaking thing because nobody had ever ever had that effect on me.
A: Adapt…
It also signals the start of pleasant motorcycling weather.
When I first met Yoda, one of the first few things he asked me was “How do you work best?” I didn’t think much of this question so I blurted out the first thing that came to my mind, “I work best under pressure” Bunuh diri kan? Little did I know that this simple answer would affect the way I was going to be supervised in the future.
I had a new birth control device implanted in my body yesterday. I was ridiculously excited about it, from the time I made the decision to do it right up until the doctor finished the process.
5. The programs designed to help people, do anything but. (You knew I couldn't get through an entire post without that stab).
Sure enough she gets the job and y’all becomes her trademark.
and a beautiful sentiment from The Craft's Meow.
And looking back now
School Food Service Journal
Shane did not ask Rickey to recite the sinner’s prayer and then leave him at the altar of the Baptist church for them to take care of. Shane asked Rickey if he could come to his home once a week for the next few months to bring the teachings of Jesus and the community of God’s people to share with his whole family and any friends he would like to invite. This was the way of sharing the Gospel and making disciples that Shane’s pastor, Neal, had been leading in their church for a couple of years, inspired by Training for Trainers, taught to Neal by Jeff Sundell, who had learned it in the decade he and his family did CPM training in Nepal and East India. It was at least a year-long commitment for both of them, and their families. Now Rickey is teaching that group, along with Shane and some others, and their home group has bounded to over twenty. When I was there Rickey’s and Shane’s daughters were piled together in a bean-bag chair, wearing dueling Duke and Carolina pajamas, for the night of the Duke-UNC basketball face-off. They have a lot more to share now that both their dads are leading their families in the struggles, pains, hopes, and victories of the Christian life.
My family.
Democracy is incredibly powerful and exciting. It’s also nuanced and complex. It’s bizarre that some people think that there is only one correct way to make a decision when you’re at the voting booth. Honestly, we should all just be thrilled to death that people are giving their vote that much consideration. Thinking strategically and making a thoughtful, reasoned decision should be celebrated.
But driving to work today—Sitting in Traffic Meditation—something occurred to me: If every conference we attend has a theme, the theme of this one was not "A Series of Unfortunate Events" but "How Unschoolers Respond to Suffering."
For many reasons, which I won't go into here, our paths diverged with E more than we would have liked as college progressed. L and I were able to maintain a close friendship over the years and distance. We probably grew even closer than ever. But there was always a part of 'us' missing.
What are the best/most important parts?
Perception of value.
Headaches and Heartaches. Not much to say about this song except that it is one of my favorites. It was brought in as a totally finished number by Sam and we all kind of said "Yeah but it should go like this" and totally changed his arrangement! It's simply a pleasure just to play on this song. More than anything I thoroughly enjoyed the entire recording process of it. Sam and I got to sing the backing vocals 'live' together in the studio (including doing a crazy kind of dance together which has me grinning from ear to ear just thinking about it) and I also had the pleasure of opening the can of beer at the end and talking those great big gulps. Ahhh. Just a great song. I love it.
Don't forget those people, animals and organizations most in need this season.
means that this rural state is
I am really pained by our gross underachievement as a race. Instead of regarding bitter truths expressed by the likes of Watson as a wake-up call for us to engage in sober reflection, we take to the expression of woolly sentiment. For me, this type of reaction is a further evidence of our unintelligence. A man of intelligence recognises genuine criticism against him and takes steps to improve himself in order to prove his critics wrong. But for us blacks, our reaction is to abuse the man who expresses worries about our backwardness.
Q:�How can you increase the
Please pray for healing, comfort. strength and courage
Starting and stopping, at least with the two experienced stokers that I enjoyed on our weekend, wasn’t all that different other than having to be better about keeping the tandem absolutely upright and getting both feet down for longer stops. On the two-place tandems, Debbie knows to off-set her weight to the left when I put my left foot down and lean the bike to the right: that’s a bozo-no-no on the Triplet… I almost dumped the bike and my stokers in the parking lot when I tried that on Sunday.
so smooth to my touch,
Please contact me if you have any questions, concerns or difficulties accessing DreamBox Learning at home.
looks the businessman in the eyes & says “Look, you have had a loan with us for years. We know that the current economic climate is dire. We as a bank know that without us granting you this loan your business would not exist. We also know that you have not made a profit for some time…However, to recognise the fact that you are the only person on this planet who can lead your business, & to take into account the untold personal sacrifices that you have had to make as a person managing your business…please pay yourself a bonus equivalent to 150% of your salary each year from now on, Oh & forget the effect that this will have to your balance sheet”. The historic day that this event takes place will be the day that banks have ONE small businessman stop criticising bankers obscene display of personal greed & remuneration.
handed on down in the order we were born
I have no doubt from observing you that you hated every day that you were using. I can see how your life was out of control, spiraling into a pit of hurt and despair. You became so lost that the helping hands of others could not even be grasp.
Go have a look. It basically takes you from the first line to the first draft to the editing process and finally to the query process. And take extra note of what you’re supposed to do on the 101st day…
leaving behind blue viens, so mechanical,
Yet at times through changeful season and scene, abrupt, alone, or in
On both trips we enjoyed fries. The first time we had truffle fries which I found to be crunchier and overall less greasy than Blanc’s with every bit as much of the funky, rich truffle aroma. On the recent trip I tried the Cajun fries which were the same in texture but lightly dusted with a seasoning that was great but, admittedly, I couldn’t really taste due to the strength of the burger’s accoutrements.
When I woke up this morning, my hair was a nest of hairspray and cigarette smoke. The eyeliner that I had lazily left on had migrated south of my cheekbones and there was a patina of glitter on my pillow. And when I got into the shower I noticed very angry-looking red rings forming little halos around my nipples.
Smuttynose IPA also comes with some welcoming mung at the bottom of the bottle (remember, I like Belgian beers and always pour them out to the very end to get that yeasty, B-vitamin goodness). The aroma is a bit weak, but the flavour is complexly bitter over a slight biscuitiness. It’s not clearly floral nor piney nor citrus, but all those together in small amounts and all combining to add up to a rich taste.
High point: More Grace and Daniel...
Tomorrow is my birthday and I find myself thinking about my own personal progress.
2. Lemonade Stand Kit - I am crazy for Lemonade Stands and these kits are one of my all time favorites. They make perfect gifts and what kid wouldn't love to get everything they need to make their very own Lemonade Stand to enjoy on a hot summer day?
Hi Everyone! Just thought I'd blog about how my Christmas turned out, I hope every one of you all had a wonderful celebration with family and friends. Christmas is my absolute favorite holiday and every year I always look forward to decorating with my family and best of all getting a freshly cut Noble Fir, just love the smell of it. It's definitely a blessing to have my family all gathered at my house to open up gifts. The best is when my mom always cooks up a fantastic meal for all of us. Below are just a few shots I took on my phone of the girls on Xmas morning.
K: This has to be handled in a graduated fashion. I’ll explain. Let’s imagine a fictitious situation, whereby the terrorists have forced 20 children onto the roofs of every single building in Gaza that has been marked as a target because it has terrorists in it. That’s what I see in my reconnaissance photographs. Every single roof is covered with children.
I have found that most psychologists, psychiatrists and other mental health professionals are not only extraordinarily compliant with authorities but also unaware of the magnitude of their obedience. And it also has become clear to me that the anti-authoritarianism of their patients creates enormous anxiety for these professionals, and their anxiety fuels diagnoses and treatments.
Don't forget that our March Beer Social will take place tomorrow night, Saturday 3/22, from 7-10 PM at Kenny Dorham's Backyard (1106 E 11th St). The weather should be clear and cool, so bring a chair and enjoy our return to outdoor Beer Socials with live music by The Lennings.
“What glitters above me,
A5 59 Times The Pain - Thanks A Lot
In the interim, the gang has been playing a lot of (sadly unpainted) Dystopian wars. As usual with a new game, we continue to figure out new rules we're forgetting, but we're getting much closer to rules transparency with every game. I'm learning the shortcomings and strengths of the Brit fleet. Likewise I'm learning to love the echelon formation, more lovingly dubbed the "Broadside Conga Line". Those hull-ripping submersibles need to be released, like, yesterday. I'm seeing a fleet based on Dreadnaughts, frigates, bombers, and Vanguard subs. Delicious!
At least over at our house on Monday mornings everyone is running around like little maniacs,lol. Where is my this and where is my that, how many minutes til the schoolbus goes?, come on now, she will be late....anybody know what im talking about?
Another growing online print and self-publishing solution in the Netherlands is Pumbo. Again, it seems to be modelled on services like Lulu, Cafepress and Unibooks. A brief look at Pumbo suggests to me that the profits for the author solutions provider are loaded heavily into the price of books to the author. A 125 page standard paperback coming in at a whopping €17+ with the equivalent ebook edition priced at €12+! There is also a delivery charge to add on depending on the amount of units ordered.
Dear President Jonathan,
5th of March 2012
I am in NO WAY like a great deal of mothers who feel that they can teach their son’s how to be men!
For example: I could write about emotions. Just recently I had someone say to me that they would like to adopt so they don't have to deal with all the emotions that come along with having a baby. Whoa! I could write about that one for sure. But do I??? We've got emotions and two years later we still got them. I never had postpartum depression with Jenna but I might say the emotions we go through as adoptive families are equal to that for sure. I could write about special needs b/c over the past year that's become a reality for us. But do I???? While I want others to know they are not alone I want to be protective of my family and our story.
It is amazing how organized this software is. All the kits are sorted, and everything that matches, always seems to be right there where you need it! The best part is when you download them from My Memories, they are automatically stored within the software, so you don't have to go searching for it when you need it!
4. Segovia, Spain
Cook, whisking constantly, until a thermometer reads 75°C.
“Oh, my dear fellow, if you want to be a gentleman you must give up being an artist. They’ve got nothing to do with one another. You hear of men painting pot-boilers to keep an aged mother – well, it shows they’re excellent sons, but it’s no excuse for bad work. They’re only tradesmen. An artist would let his mother go to the workhouse.”
Less than three weeks till the Marine Corps Historic Half! I’m starting to get really excited about this one, even though it kicks my butt every year. But I’m still optimistic after my performance in Charlottesville, and now that I have more time in the afternoons and evenings, I can concentrate fully on training. This last month or so before school gets out is always tricky because it starts to get really hot by the time I get home, and I’m less likely to run if I wait till later in the evening. In the summer I get to run first thing in the morning, which is ideal. I guess I could go to the gym right after school, but I hate everything about that place, so I’d rather avoid it if at all possible. Yet I still hang on to my membership… I guess I just have to take it week by week.
If all I could do was peruse the market, I would be content with that. But as luck would have it, I did get to do a bit of cooking during this trip. I knew I wanted to make a seafood dish but the question was which seafood. It's funny how an abundance of fish, clams, and fresh water crab can confuse a usually decisive person. In the end, I settled with squid. My plan was to fry it and serve with a dressing made up of fresh garlic, jalapenos and culantro. Not cilantro. Culantro.
‘Dickless Chix’ by Molly Heckard & Sarah Joyce
I give this movie a 75 out of 100. Worth a rent, Netflix it in a few months.
22 The hanging sequence movie clip which you just exited will be selected by default now. Go to the Property inspector and give it the Instance name hangman_mc.
I am glad to have them.
Bjorn Lomborg took an interesting approach: Let’s presume that man has had an impact on global warming, what will the results be if man implements the plans that governments have laid out. He concluded that governments will get much more powerful and have all sorts of control, the economy will be severely burdened, people’s quality of life will suffer and if we are lucky the globe will warm one hundredth of one degree less.
getting new followers on my blog
Happy new year! It is going to be a busy one for me, preparing for a new book and solo show in early Autumn. First though, I am taking part in The Courtauld Institute of Art's East Wing X: Material Matters show. This opens from the 21th January at the Institute in Somerset House in London - but being a working college it is only open to the public on the last Saturday of each month. If you want to catch the show though, it runs until June 2013, which should give you plenty of opportunity. I have a mix of older and newer work in the show, including the image above, taken near Somerset house at the end of last year. You can also see work by War Boutique, Laura Keeble, Gabriel Dawe, Paula Rego, Damien Hirst, Simon Edmonson and over 30 other artists. My work is downstairs in the cafe, so if you get there early you can probably grab a fry-up too. Find more info here.
The Brooklyn Historical Society (BHS), the Weeksville Heritage Center and Irondale Ensemble Project have been chosen to receive two major federal grants to fund their joint project “In Pursuit of Freedom,” a multifaceted program that memorializes the history of abolitionism and the Underground Railroad in Brooklyn.
Neighbouring Prides: The Sohebele pride occupied the central region of Motswari’s traversing, and as a result, this kept most of their neighbours on the periphery of the reserve. To the north, it was the Jacaranda Pride; to the north-west it was the Timbavati Pride; to the west it was the Voel Dam Pride; in the south-west it was the Ross Pride; to the south it was the Machaton Pride; to the east it was the old Mayumbuya Pride.
Hania kept asking me whether I had figured out the being’s identity. No, I hadn’t. She seemed highly amused by my cluelessness. Finally, unable to contain herself any longer, she told me who he was. I was completely surprised, despite knowing all about her channeling relationship. I had been confused by his ordinariness, I explained, having previously encountered him as a much more impressive presence. She said that he sometimes appears in this very human guise, and other times shows his larger self. Well, that’s true of those of us who are embodied, too, and so it seems quite plausible to me. Here are her words: “Jesus Christ, out of His love for me, makes Himself as large or small as is needed to allow me to be with Him best at the time. Our relationship has an aspect of being friends, and He will make Himself to whatever scale is most reassuring for me at the time, so I can maintain this feeling, so as not to intimidate me and throw me off ’the friends’ track.’ Sometimes He is immeasurable, other times as you experienced Him then.”
If you are a Canadian and insist upon the latter, please know that it’s embarrassing. You sound ignorant. You sound American. (For the Americans out there, I’m sorry. I might touch on my view on the American-Canadian thing later. No major offense intended, honestly.) We will forgive you though. We probably won’t even say anything. We don’t want to hurt your feelings, or anything.
I’ve noted on January 28th that I went to the boat for the first time since Rob had died. I wondered if Rob had left any note of any kind in the safe on the boat. Wasn’t really expecting it as we’d discussed everything, but knew I had to get into the safe. Had a struggle but with the help of his friend Mike, we got in. There was no note, just Rob’s valuables, his jewellery, etc. I noted that I was surprisingly unemotional.
Boots - Jessica Simpson - gifted
We were in the second row from the front so we had a great view. It was really quite a small set, bless it. I did take some photos of the actual set, but since we weren't technically supposed to, I shan't post them on here just in case I get an angry email from the BBC ...
The House of Harlow 1960 ‘Riley’ chain-strap clutch purse retails for $275.
Apparently he was rolling down a hillside at his grandfather’s ranch in western South Dakota, in the Black Hills. Something he and his brothers had done on occasion. And this particular day, he happened unfortunately .. upon a patch of cactus.
The process was based on cladding strategies used on larger scale projects with non orthogonal geometries, like the Walt Disney concert Hall in Los Angeles. The complex topography of the side wall forms was analyzed to smaller triangular or trapezoid surfaces. The forms are separated into two basic elements: structure and “skin”. The structure was laser cut iron members that were welded and mounted on the side walls, forming a “skeleton” that would carry the “skin”; the plywood surfaces. All surfaces are mapped out, numbered and cut “sur mesure” from 2.50X1.20m plywood sheets.
3And there came out of the smoke locusts upon the earth: and unto them was given power, as the scorpions of the earth have power.
If Jesus is good news… would you not share good news with everyone?
She read out a victim’s impact statement saying the child would scream when anyone bathed her or changed her diaper.
I have a little wish regarding Rufus’ summer tour: He is starting a wide-scale tour, actually as of yesterday 30 April opening with aLondon concert; covering homelandCanada, US, andEurope. I wish he would fit aTurkey concert somewhere within one of the little empty parts of the schedule (anywhere in June or July before he goes back to US), or that I find the chance to listen to him live somewhere along the tour. If he comes, that would be his second visit toTurkey after the 2008 concert that I unfortunately missed. I cannot bear to miss him another time.
The Q69 Casanova allegedly tried to bed the woman, who says she’s single.
Shutter speed : 1/2.5 seconds
after that I asked my second question
Then, a few things started to happen that compelled me to make some changes here to protect my identity and the students I teach (you’ll note some password protected posts now. Regular readers can contact me for it).
If it hadn’t been for the child then none of this might have happened.
This record does not contain a clear indication that the applicant departed from the general rule for the article "a." Nothing in the claim language, specification, or prosecution history compels an exceptional reading of "a" in this case. The district court erred by misapplying the term "said fabric roll" later in the claim and the phrase "in intimate contact with the fabric roll" in the specification. Initial Order, slip op. at 8. As noted above, the use of a definite article ("said" or "the") to refer back to an initial indefinite article does not implicate, let alone mandate the singular. Because the initial indefinite article ("a") carries either a singular or plural meaning, any later reference to that same claim element merely reflects the same potential plurality. In grammatical terms, the instances of "said fabric roll" in the claim are anaphoric phrases, referring to the initial antecedent phrase. Because the initial phrase carries no definitive numerosity, the anaphoric phrases do not alter that meaning in the slightest.
To which I say: Let’s re-cap…
What are you guys up to?
It’s raining . . . again. One minute we are popcorning around and enjoying the garden and the next second Mummy is scooping us up and rushing us in. We hadn’t been in the garden for awhile. Mummy was bringing us grass but it just wasn’t the same.
Curry Powder
Compared to what we have from where I come from (the Philippines), everything in America is super-sized, or is geared to being one. And I mean, everything! That includes houses, cars, buildings, clothes, furniture, grocery items, fast food items and all things you can think of. I believe this is one of the results of a free enterprise. Competition is tough, that’s why every company there is has to fight tooth and nail to get their market. And how? Well, by catering to one of human nature’s weakness -greed - and sending messages that inculcate within us “the bigger, the better” mentality.
It's a Wonderful Life ... NBC ... 8 PM *FAVORITE CLASSIC
The boys think it is SUPER cool and they keep chatting about how they can't wait to show their friends which makes this a successful project in this mommy's book! It's my goal to give them a space they love to play and hang out in!
The snow balls were so dense and so big that I had to gently break them up with an ice pick. The next tool, and one that Bisou has always been wary of, was the hair dryer. But this time she seemed to understand her situation, and submitted. I let her finish drying off and relax the rest of the afternoon, and waited until evening to tackle the mats.
I bought the magazine (Burda 03/12) on Thursday and finished sewing the dress on Sunday. The only reason it took that long was because I had to wait till Saturday to get to Spotlight for thread and a zip. (Btw, I'm wearing a black cardigan over it today which goes better with the black tights than the pale green merino thermal on it's own - only took the cardy off for the photo!)
Jesse: (Smiling sympathetically.) Oh God. (Rubs his face with both hands.)
Makes one 10-inch quiche. Feel free to try adding mushrooms, spinach and red onions instead of bacon and zucchini. It is delicious!
An incident at the uni 2 weeks ago beats last year’s hands down. On a fine Wednesday morning, while I was working at the office, I got a text message from a guy who saw my Car-For-Sale ad (will talk about why I’m selling in the next section). Overwhlemed by excitement, I got totally disoriented. All I knew was I needed to get home ASAP.
3 pieces
I was quite well known for the driver who liked his coffee.
Gotta run,
– Southern Conference tournament semifinal appearances since 1985: 1
Wax Right between the eyes UK/US
I did manage to stitch some more on Mermmie, and i want to stitch on her all week. On the HAED BB my yearly goal was to stitch 4 pages of her, and i would like to nearly be there, as after page 4 ( not that i have finished page 3 yet) there is only 1 3/4 pages to stitch and a lot of them are blocks of colour.
Then add your dry ingredients one at a time, mixing in between each one: sugar, brown sugar, baking soda, xanthan gum, salt and then the flour. Mix the dry ingredients in really well.
Colonel Sanders: Did I miss one?
I knew that I wanted to paint the cabinets white. As much as I enjoy look of wood, the cabinets and floors combined were a little too much.
- Initiate ad hoc projects as needed within the department.
another tip is adjusting the brightness of your pic if it seems too dark.
* Male / Female
25. An Un-Earthly Red
Nothing puts things in perspective like a trip to the children's hospital.
1/4 cup dehydrated carrots or 1cup diced fresh carrots
but I know that I feel like I'm doing something wrong.
Siggi Loch’s journey has followed a trajectory all of its own. After stumbling across the music of Sidney Bechet at the age of 15, he formed a band and began dreaming of running his own jazz label. Half a century ago he was among the R&B fans getting a first taste of The Beatles at the Star Club in Hamburg. Soon afterwards he produced some of the first tracks by the pop group The Searchers as he embarked on a career as a talent-spotter, producer and major label executive.
I believe God wants to accomplish some big things in our lives. These things can only be accomplished by the Lord working through people of faith so that He might receive all the glory. Have you arrived at the place where your faith is fully available for Him to use?
“Our best seller is the goat’s milk lotion,” she said. “We sell a lot of that. I use it everyday. If I have a cut, scrape, burn, or bruise, I put it on there because it has these wonderful healing properties. Even my husband and son use it now. But, I use it everyday. I take a long bath and then I dab it on to my face afterwards.”
2. My car is broken, ok really just my sunglass holder in my car is broken, but still I loved that sunglass holder!
Beat the egg whites with the superfine sugar, lemon drops and salt using an electric mixer starting from low to high speed for about 7 minutes or until the meringue is fluffy and shiny.
The fourth installment of this children’s animated franchise is back once again with its stars Ray Romano, Denis Leary and John Leguizamo, as Manny, Diego and Sid. There are a lot of all new characters voiced by people such as Jennifer Lopez to Peter Dinklage. This time the story revolves around the continents splitting apart after the end of the ice age and the gang must make their way across the sea. It’s a fun series and parents will definitely take their kids to see another one of these.
But it is only logical to assume that a payment was in fact made. There would have been no incentive for Ansar Dine to release the woman otherwise. Moreover, Islamic law permits the collection of ransoms after abducting non-Muslims—a precept with which Ansar Dine is certainly familiar. Ansar Dine probably has a little more spending money today than it had prior to the Stockly affair.
Breakfast: Slim-Fast shake
In addition, a review of the research finds little evidence for the common assertion that small businesses are responsible for the majority of job creation in the United States or that tax breaks for small businesses generally — as distinguished from start-up ventures — are effective at stimulating jobs or growth in Gross Domestic Product (GDP).
Two: the Regeneration of Time
Mr Lay added that it was possible the penguin had been eaten, but he was doubtful.
What are you up to musically these days?
Date: Thu, Apr 1, 2010 at 7:06 PM
Never thought I'd be so damn happy for a result to be glandular fever but considering the other option was leukaemia, I am ecstatic.
April 7– Monday– Washington, D.C.– Lord Lyons, the British Minister, reports to the Foreign Secretary regarding the treaty on cooperation in suppression of the slave trade. “I have . . . this morning signed the Treaty; and I have, in deference to Mr. Seward’s opinion, admitted the Clause limiting the duration. . . . the Senate does not always confine itself to ratifying or rejecting a Treaty absolutely. It very frequently makes amendments or alterations. It appears, therefore, to be more consistent with the Dignity of the Queen, that even if Her Majesty approve of the Treaty as it stands, Her Ratification should not be given, until it is certain that the President has been authorised by the Senate to give the Ratification of the United States.”
Okay so you slot the third petal in the "un-glued" part of the 2nd and this is what you get.
All those whose actions damage the party, the nationalist cause and our political growth in society - will be remembered.
As we have profusely documented, as polls show that fewer and fewer Americans are convinced by the pseudo-science behind man-made global warming, promulgated as it is by control freaks like Zwick who care more about money and power than they do the environment, AGW adherents are becoming increasingly authoritarian in their pronouncements.
12 May 2011, Thursday
A few photos:
Just saw the Avengers movie last night with my gaming group. Very cool and very, very fun, although there was definitely at least one "DAMN YOU WHEDON!!" moment. Then of course we spent the rest of the night spouting quotes and reminding each other of scenes we had just seen less than an hour ago.
At the end of the first day, we were exhausted and hungry and sad. It was hard to be there and the faint memory of those warm fuzzy feelings from that morning were just that, a faint memory. In total, we spent about a week there and between four and five hours per day.
09 Oh Boy
Birla Temple
In later recordings and performances, Omar would sing that verse and add the line "Boujemâa doesn't die".
Rafael Gil: There are a lot of people who are not with us because they do not know what we are about. We are all in this together, those people who are working and those who are unemployed, the police and the college student. We are the 99%.
This recipe comes courtesy of Sally Cameron, from NZ Gardener Homegrown series, the Tomato edition. It uses plenty of tomatoes, and isnt to difficult to make.....
Not bad for 90 minutes of work. It would have been less, but I had to get passed reading the instructions! In my opinion, its easier to take it one step at a time...don't read ahead! You'll end up looking back and forth from the fabric to the directions thinking that it would just be easier to buy the finished product instead of sewing it yourself!
As I sat looking out over the water I realized I was holding my breath waiting for movement. I think there is a lesson to be learned. We try to move through different life stages seamlessly. We even wear our flexibility like a badge of honor. I like the idea that nature has built in a period of rest... time to heal, repair, accept change...find our footing again before sending us rushing in a different direction.
10. Little Drops of Rain (Reprise) - Robert Goulet
In a press conference yesterday Kuala Lumpur Archbishop Murphy Pakiam asked the AG for the rationale behind his decision: “I appeal to the Attorney General to explain the decision not to take further action on the Al-Islam journalists’ case.”
Distinguishing Features: MAHOOSIVE SCHLONG
But then we move here, and suddenly it’s like I can’t wait to get away from him. I want to work extra hours and not because of the pay. I want to spend all the time I can downstairs at my sisters so I don’t have to talk to him. Or worse, hear him talk. He doesn’t ever want to talk about anything important to us, as a couple, only what he heard on the radio that day or saw on the news or read on line. He’s worked a whole 5 days since November as a temp at the book bindery that my brother in law works at. He’s not looked for a real job since right before Christmas. His car needs a new alternator. His phone bill is out of control. He wants a new this and a new that and he complains all the time about the house (which was built in the 40’s and taken very good care of ever!) is too cold too drafty too…whatever. It snows too much in Wisconsin. It’s too cold for him to go jogging. He wants his own garage. He wants his own laundry room so that I don’t have to go all the way downstairs to use my sister’s. He hates my brother in law (don’t worry, it’s mutual) and doesn’t want to be down there when he’s there. Which makes it pretty hard for him to be down there because my BiL hates for anyone to be over when he’s not home (I dunno, he just does). But that’s okay since I go down there to get away from him anyways!
that lies beneath
In the celebratory speech given by Adams in 1862, which I think we can now assume was based largely on information supplied by Foster himself, he boasted of having been married five times, and to have fathered 17 children, with the oldest daughter born c.1784. The last of these claims is obviously unrealistic, if we now accept that he was born in 1774, and would have been a mere 10 years old at the time. While I have only found evidence for two children, I accept there may well have been several others.
It’s rare that I bake a cake. Apart from the fact that my baking acutraments leave something to be desired, 2 out of 3 of us in residence aren’t that fussed about cake. Having said that, a birthday is not complete without one & so around this time every year I root out my hand-me-down rusty cake tins & set about making birthday cakes.
892 ***D-XII/7/1984. “Gods, Games and Heroes in Pindar.” First Friday Lecture Series, The Basic Program, The University of Chicago, The Cultural Center, Chicago Public Library, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item B-7, above, pp. 76-92 (1997).)
Personally, I think the guy has been scammed. Wasn't all this just a little too easy? What kind of woman hangs around cheap motels and lets perfect strangers manhandle her ample, jutting charms in public? I think he is going to wake up all alone the next morning with a lump on his noggin, bad hangover, an empty wallet, and no car.
Watching Onegin, I got all choked up about the cruelty of passion, and the, uhhh, futility of bad love. I thought I'd just stay for an hour then leave. But I stayed for the whole damn show because I wanted to see that Hottie take the trash out.
They started fighting, with the boyfriend grabbing Bottieri and Bottieri ripping off the boyfriend’s shirt. Bottieri called 911 and the boyfriend left, though he was found nearby.
We look forward to seeing your own bikes in our new gallery, and thanks for joining our worldwide community.
Phlebotomist, what an odd word; imagine introducing yourself at parties as a phlebotomist. Martha supposed she would become familiar with all the odd idiosyncrasies of medical lingo in the coming months. Perhaps she could drop a few of them into conversation during some of her own social gatherings, just to gain that sense of superiority that would be destroyed when the doctor completed this sentence.
“It so does not make sense to allow the kinds of contaminants that are routinely in sewage sludge … onto our farm fields, to allow them to be put on pasture land where cows graze that give us milk,” said Maureen Reilly of the group Sludge Watch.
As I glanced down to check out our own chosen foot attire,I warmed momentarily to Chefs' muddy(I forgot to pack my good shoes)Merrells.
Unaccompanied by a canine companion, I could walk through the park as if invisible. On the few occasions when I had custody of a friend's dogs, however, suddenly I became quite noticeable. The leash, the collar, the wagging tails were my passport, the secret handshake that grants entrance into the private club. Fellow dog walkers and owners came over to say hello and chat. With two dogs trotting close to my heels, I was immediately embraced within the doggy community. The only thing more effective at attracting attention would've been pushing a carriage with a cute baby in it.
The meek behaviour and fear of authority shown by ex-detainees, the intimidating and domineering posture of the security personnel, attempted and successful suicides committed by ex-prisoners such as Leon Madakeni, "Mark", and Nonhlanhla Makhuba when faced with the possibility of re-arrest, and the common mental disturbance of the guards and personnel at Quatro, and what they talked about in their deranged state, threw light on what one was likely to expect in this "rehabilitation centre".
9. Make icing by whisking powdered sugar with maple syrup until smooth. Drizzle over the top of the cake and serve warm or at room temperature.
Frankly, for blog publishers and researchers of every kind, Wikipedia takes the cake. As a very active blog content writer, I can confirm that I visit it every single day, and not once either. You will, too — if you want your articles to be informative, grounded by fact and not just your opinions.
The segment’s underlying first-quarter combined ratio decreased 1.7 points to 86.1—the lowest it has been in 10 years, according to Long.
But that’s just what happened this week. I pulled off the road, and after just a few minutes I saw two wolves running down a slope, straight at me. They spooked a big horn sheep, who ran up the slope. They came within a couple of hundred feet of me, and were joined by another wolf. The three of them tussled around, and I got to watch them, by myself, for about 15 minutes before other people came. Cars did drive by, but I think because I don’t have one of those big scopes, no one thought I was seeing anything. Fine with me!
DK: It’s not so much a digital strategy as it is an audience strategy. It just so happens that our audience is reading us on an increasing number of digital platforms and we have to be there in a form that satisfies the expectations of that medium. The strategy is constantly evolving as new platforms and technologies emerge.
Recept: That's what I've been trying to tell you, Mr. President.
He looked at his watch and stared solemnly down the hallway at the front door, half expecting it to spring open with his daughter in tow. It didn’t and he let out a slight moue as his focus switched to the dried and cracked lambs blood above the door of his daughters room. Not a good sign. He hoped Carmen would return soon. He walked back over to the alter, knelt down in front of it, lit some candles and a stick of incense. He silently uttered a few incantations of protection, adding a prayer or two for God to forgive him for his transgressions but he held little hope for this, after all, why would God forgive you when you can’t forgive yourself? Sighing deeply he went back to packing his things.
The rain stopped for a while and I finally managed to get that night photos of the Christmas lights up in Orchard Road, Singapore.
a mob of kangaroos
Tha's me done. Over to Kristen . . . . . .
At this point, as my readers have doubtless guessed, we’ve strayed into the realm of magical combat. You’ll notice that lightning bolts from wands and incantations in bad Latin are not involved; those belong to cheap fantasy fiction, not to actual magic. Instead, the combat is a struggle of narratives or, if you will, of ways of structuring experience. Among the tools that practitioners of mass thaumaturgy use to weave their spells are emotionally charged images and ideas that trigger the hardwired binary reaction in our brains. Among the effective options for doing battle with them, in turn, is ternary logic, which defuses the binary reaction so that whatever issue is up for discussion can be put back into its actual context, and is no longer seen exclusively through the filter of food/nonfood, predator/nonpredator, and the like.
He is taken down and buried in a grave marked
“Eight.”
bake for about 9 minutes on each side and then drain on paper towels.
Before his skull cracked the glass
Inking irksome lies.
“My problem is that I must make all the preparations for the love making with the cushion!”
Happy Stitching w/whatever you're working on!
As the 'bridge' book in this trilogy, Underworld does not disappoint. Oftentimes the second book is considered the filler and often riddled with unnecessary plot lines to extend a series, but Underworld is quite the opposite. If anything, this book has just built this story up to a perfect climax, leaving the reader at the edge and ready to crash down to an incredible conclusion. Be prepared to be completely blown by this book and fall even harder for the King of the Underworld.
It was the latest demonstration in an action-packed two weeks which have seen a mass mock funeral through Enfield, appearances on national radio and huge coverage in the trade press and beyond, triggering a discussion about the future role of quality local journalism in this country.
At the request of a reader I’ve asked BookEnds clients to give us some of their most over-the-top marketing strategies. Here’s what some of them said . . .
Surrey County Hall
SPN’s fall 2010 conference featured the man perhaps happiest with the explosion in virtual education: Jeb Bush. “I have a confession to make,” he said with grin. “I am a real policy geek, and this is like the epicenter of geekdom.” Bush shared his experiences initiating some of the nation’s first for-profit and virtual charter school reforms as the governor of Florida, acknowledging his policy ideas came from some in the room. (The local SPN affiliate in Tallahassee is the James Madison Institute.)
I indeed had been indifferent as the soldiers around me whose indifference I was attempting to capture.
I forget about the way I’ve hurt people; I forget about times when I snuck around, lied, entered into a relationship with one of my best friend’s ex-boyfriends. I forget about the drinking, the smoking, the cursing, the dark thoughts.
"You're supposed to be their parent, not their friend."
Bliss
When all at once I saw a crowd,
The favorite dessert is prepared using yeast or baking powder and baking soda. But now I tried using active dry yeast. It turns out so soft and delicious. After fermented, the batter becomes very thick so you need to add extra water otherwise it was unable to spread. Once the bubbles appear, drizzle with butter, sprinkle with ground peanut and sugar, continue cooking until the bottom turns golden brown, fold in half.
Yes, the 24-plank machine-controlled set is a rather ugly and distractingly noisy thing. Yes, Robert Lepage's production suggests someone reliant more on momentary inspiration than on grand overarching vision. And sure, the Metropolitan Opera Orchestra's performance under Fabio Luisi mostly seemed blandly competent rather than inspired. All of this may well start to bug me more in the later, longer installments of Lepage's new production of the complete Ring cycle, if not corrected. For the relatively trim Das Rheingold, however, there were just enough moments of visual splendor—the planks contorting to create a distorted stairwell, for instance, as well as some of the video projections—to satisfy me. And, of course, the opera itself is glorious; its thematic elements—its skeptical view of man's folly, the damaging effects of unchecked power on the human soul, etc.—still come through amidst Lepage's technological gimcrackery, and the music is still as brilliant as ever. For a novice of Wagner's Ring of the Nibelung live, this was fine. Not transcendent, not thought-provoking, and not especially affecting, but fine. We'll see how the rest of this new Metropolitan Opera production shakes out.
My good omen
I hope this will bring about more brewers to put on full flavored low alcohol session beers. The simple fact is that if a brewer can get maximum flavor out of a true session beer I will drink drink anything that brewer ever makes from that point on. It is truly a skill. 15 malts and 20 hop varieties might sound like a neat novelty, but that isn't a beer you want to come back to again and again.
What the debate demonstrates is that we know almost nothing about the number of innocent people in prison. That is because any effort to estimate it involves extrapolation from just two numbers, neither one satisfactory.
And this guy ..
I could not resist God anymore, so I got up. But before I opened my laptop I asked Him to confirm the message with His Word. I got my Bible and asked Him to let me open to the verse that would confirm the message and its urgency. I shivered because what I saw immediately as I opened my Bible is this: LAMENTATIONS in bold letters, and the first 2 verses which the Complete Jewish Bible says:
The good thing, for people who shrink at the thought of having to create new and exciting activities from scratch every week, is that we have so many holidays and special occasions as a family, as a country and across the globe from which to draw inspiration. More on that later.
with their volumes in gold and in brown;
In some ancient Sanskrit texts it is called 'Sukhaantar' or 'Sukhtardvip'.
Or I could ask about your domestic bubble. Do you feel like you are in one? Are you happy in it or do you want to be released? I had a comment from a fellow wordpresser once who said that she knew what I meant about escaping the bubble but she found she was more comfortable in it.
We all knew that VB was the single biggest selling beer in Melbourne because, well, it’s the biggest selling beer in Australia – has been since God’s dog was a pup! What we didn’t now was that “the beer we drink does vary according to our postcode,” the article suggested. It then contradicted itself by saying that VB was the top-selling beer in liquor shops IN EVERY STORE SURVEYED IN MELBOURNE AND REGIONAL VICTORIA. Excuse me, but have you seen my ‘variance’??
In the pouring rain, we rode bikes, attempted ocean kayaking twice (the second time was successful), successfully river kayaked, swam and played in the waves, rode our bikes again, and zip-lined. It was a nice relaxing day in the Caribbean. We were exhausted.
There are times in my life where I display a lot of pride and even bravado when it comes to things that I do. However, I never claim perfection and definitely don’t want to defend wrong actions. That is where my humility has come into play.
I am going to sit back and let the photos tell the story. Congratulations, Jeff and Mindy! God has blessed you with love, laughter and health, two beautiful children and 25 wonderful years. Here's to the next 25!
Power Distance
12. Take Ourselves Seriously
Sample of recent academic writing
Tuesday was May Day… May 1st and it is apparently a public holiday here, so I had the day off… paid. That was nice!
Verb Forms: Talk – Talked – Talking
through the body, so that at the same instant we said Jesus. I put on the
Mitt, is not the type of malleable person that George W. Bush was so it will be interesting to see what direction the Santorum and Romney meeting will take them. The Mormon Church relies heavily on Government to feed the hungry and that is in direct conflict with the goal of the Tea Party and the Ryan Plan.
According to the researchers, this method of understanding market connections could help each country predict when a financial crisis is imminent, allowing it to set up policies that will protect their own markets from becoming dangerously intertwined with struggling markets. "In the current era, when the global financial village is highly prone to systematic collapses, our approach can provide a sensitive 'financial seismograph' to detect early signs of global crisis," Prof. Ben-Jacob says.
Fyrinnae - Sequined Master (applied to lower lash line, and outer V, blended into the crease)
6th day - No plans for visiting, therefore spending the day at home and later went out to buy some stuff with mum. Dinner with family near home.
Sunday 6 May 2012
The true heroes are the young men and women who put on their uniforms and fight; not because they love war or violence (or because I do), but because they are prepared to stand up for what they believe in against an implacable, unenlightened foe. More than that, the fact they are willing to serve and risk all is the only thing which stands between the likes of Miss Katz and death or slavery. Whatever they think of her, they allow her to exist; the reverse is not and cannot be true.
The officer went to his car with John’s license and sat on the radio for several minutes as John walked to the Mustang. He took only a few steps before the officer’s spot light hit him from behind, causing a slight stutter-step as he neared the trunk of the car. As he peeked in the rear passenger-side window to see Charlotte still asleep, the spot light faded. John turned back towards the police car and walked slowly, hands in his front pockets, as he watched distant headlights approaching followed by tail lights shrinking away. One particular set of headlights grew closest, followed by a rectangular set of yellow lights that outlined the trailer of an eighteen-wheeler rumbling towards him. As it drew near, he closed his eyes and accepted the burst of warm air and exhaust left in its wake.
A special illustrated version of our podcast 'Five Points Part 2: The Fate of Five Points" is now available on our NYC History Archive feed.
I've only used the first two chapters with my kids so far and I can't wait to see how they take to some more lessons. Lately I've felt that my class has lost some excitement and urgency during Daily 5, and Comprehension Connections is giving us all a new way to think about reading. I hope you check this book out and let me know what you think!
If you already read my blog, I hope you’ll encourage me with comments and likes, and good will along the way.
no powder.
It was a hot, sunny day and there were hundreds of people there - picnicking, sun bathing and exploring every corner of the grounds.
It was fabulous having her wearing some of the pieces from the book since I cannot wear them myself. She was styled by Wyatt White and I.
So when I rose well before Micah last Saturday and decided to wake him with breakfast in bed, and it was a little cool in the house, and we had an apple and some dates and pecans in the kitchen just begging to be cooked…well, how could I resist?
d.Working long days in a manual environment was tiring.On one occasion when I collected him he was barely able to converse.I commented 'its hard working long hours isn't it? Now you know how I feel'
Mikkeller It's Alive!
New rules could affect lenders with large inventories of outstanding repurchase requests.
6. I was camping for 2 weeks on the coast with family and have fabulous pictures to share soon!
Tuesday we toured Grand Teton. We had lunch at the Signal Mountain Lodge where I ate my first elk chili. I didn't take my camera with me unfortunately. Too bad since the views from the dining room were spectacular. The chili was good, but if you hadn't told me it wasn't beef chili, I wouldn't have known.
Keep in mind, most babies are fairly active inside the womb and they turn a lot — even during labor. So, chances are, whatever position your baby is in now will not be the same position he or she will be in a few hours from now.
It is worth noting that each of these positive measures takes aim at one or two of the factors that have led to decline. The Benedict option seeks to break the hold of political polarization on the church. The postmodern opportunity aims to re-engage the cultural elites. The next Christendom has already strongly undermined the contention that Christianity merely reflects Western culture and imperialism. And if there is an “age of diminished expectations,” it could erode both the materialism and even the sexual licentiousness (which always works best in the midst of material plenty) that have undermined faith.
Learn from Experience: Parts I & II (Japan…Mikio Naruse)
I hate to have a house; business; car; or appliances here! If I cannot do it myself then to hell with it.
For more on these things, click the links below.
Ask God to reveal your sins to you so that you can ask forgiveness.
How much would the developer earn? That’s tough to calculate, because we don’t know how many suites would be sold at different price points. At an average of 30% of the top price, the average suite would cost $139,200. At 40%, the cost would be $185,600. At 50%, it would be $232,000.
Least of all, your social life is going to have an entirely new character. You might lose track of single non-parenting friends. You might not have time for much socializing at all depending on the health and temperment of your baby. But there are also opportunities to meet an entirely new group of people because you’re in the parenting club now. But how exactly will this happen?
Athens was a city that I was really looking forward to going to. After going to Rome and seeing all of these ancient ruins, mixed in with amazing architecture, fountains on every corner I had really high expectations for Athens. I was at first really disappointed as we drove through crazy, busy streets with really modern, simple architecture and graffiti EVERYWHERE. My first impression was Ah, typical big city.
To someone who’s miserable:
Follow the instructions for your ice-cream maker; the bowl of mine needs to be frozen overnight and this base needs to sit overnight, so start your prep the night before.
As an early childhood educator, I realize that teaching little ones involves a lot of preparation. Maria Montessori referred to it as "the prepared environment." Many hours are spent before the child even enters the classroom, not only deciding which lessons will be taught and how, but every detail of the classroom. Thought goes into which materials are placed on the shelf, their most advantageous placement, and how they might be used (the intended uses as well as the not-so-intended) by the children. (It's this same "teacher think" that makes me cringe when others buy my children any sort of stick-like toy. I can just imagine the possibilities . . .)
The best and the worst thing about Hellboy 2 is how it looks. As I mentioned, for the second installment Guillermo Del Toro has dispensed with a human protagonist, and along with it, any real grounding in the world of man. Humans here do little more than scream and run away, and even the awesome Jeffrey Tambor is pretty much put on the shelf by the time the real action gets going. Hellboy 2 is immersed in the world of demons, fairies and trolls, with Del Toro exercising his creature-concepting skills to their fullest - it's like the original Hellboy has merged with the fantasy sequences of Pan's Labyrinth. All this gorgeousness and grotesquery - the troll market, Tooth Fairies, the Golden Army itself - makes for a visual feast, but it also weighs down the action sequences. When there's so much to look at and so many details to play with, it becomes harder to block out action sequences that don't look entirely like cartoons. There's nothing here as adrenaline-pumping as Hellboy 1's fight scene in the New York Subway.
The company employs about 400 people. Its largest creditors include Haskell Jewels, American Express and FedEx Corp., according to the filing.
Yorkshire Bitter 5.0%. Brewed in Masham by Black Sheep, this beer is described as "a classic and beautifully balanced Yorkshire bitter combining hoppy notes with bittersweet malty undertones and a dry, refreshing finish.". The front label also highlights "Demerara sweetness with full malt body and citrus overtones." I don't have anything else to add to that, except that this is a pleasant and highly quaffable bitter, instantly recognisable as coming from Black Sheep and, yes I can detect the Demerara sugar lurking in the background.
The film featured appearances and performances by many of the true greats in R&B and Blues music, including Aretha Franklin, James Brown, Ray Charles, Cab Calloway, and many others.
My 4 years old nephew had passed away yesterday afternoon peacefully at home. He’s gone so fast and so easily …. alhamdulillah!
Miss Lively reportedly gave up her rental apartment in New York City's Chelsea neighborhood not so long ago and stays in hotels when in Manhattan for business or pleasure.
Mazwayi’s opinion was echoed by a score of residents interviewed in parts of Khayelitsha where vigilante action is common.
I can just about vote for the Conservatives with a clothes peg on my nose, and doubtless I will do so in a few weeks' time. But I won't work for it. The frustration is simply too great. I would much rather offer criticism and praise from the sidelines, according to mood. It is not a good thing to be contemptuous of any organisation whilst an officer (however lowly) within it.
The tears began to well up in her eyes. What she wanted more than anything was for someone to help her-- to wash her hair, take her to bed, call her boss, and maybe run to the drugstore to pick up some Gravol.
The contracts cited by AFP included the 114 million euro (RM457 million) one paid by the Malaysian government to Perimekar. The second, called “C5 contract of engineering business,” was concluded in August 2000 between DCNI, a subsidiary of DCN, and Thales International Asia worth some 30 million euro (RM132 million). The third was the “consulting agreement” signed in October 2000 between Thint Asia and Terasasi.
“Are you ensuring, at all times, that your kitty is safe from the dangers of the world?”
Allagash Four: 3.56 Mugs
I once encountered someone who said there was nothing redeemable about his mother and he was in his 60′s. I found that sad. As a child, we can internalize negativities and hold anger and resentment. As an adult, we must look deeper and be that bridge – be that connection. It was sad to me that a person could be so incredibly bitter towards someone who gave him life. If you can’t find a single positive thing about your parents, then you probably will lead a very bitter and disconnected life.
Children of the Dutch royal family are destined to carry along the torch of treason.
Two children bring their mothers (fathers/teachers who ever) a problem, one adult says, “Stop telling tales; go and sort it out yourself.” Second adult stops what they are doing, completely focusses on the child – they may go and help sort out the problem, they may not (more about this later). Which child is more likely to tell another tale?
"No, choose!"
Another era hath begun.
Yet I feel some warmth for that lonely old house
I loved this Anders Ruff invitation but I really wanted to get his photo on their so I designed my own and reworked things a bit to make it work. I love the way they turned out!
For my colleagues, so they know how much I appreciate their growing confidence and support in me. Your adventures are mine, too. We are a team!
The most important statement on the page comes at the bottom:
Throughout this presentation there have been arguments made for its political, aesthetic, cultural, historical, spiritual value, but nothing can be effectively done to save or restore this building in its current state and with its history. It’s completely, utterly hopeless.
1. Stay far away from any company or course that ‘guarantees’ you’ll make ‘X’ amount of money in a certain period of time. Even if their product is amazing they can’t guarantee a thing because they don’t know you. They have no idea how hard you’ll work or how seriously you’ll take your business.
There have been various theories suggested as to why this was the case, and I thought it useful to look at these, and the implications of the Cadder case for the testing of the video tape.
she becomes a California Girl
April 9, 2011 2:30-5:30 Gypsy Welded Shape cards
o Frye Regional Medical Center, Hickory, NC – Stroke Gold
I promise to get on to the content soon but must just add that Heriot's stylish cover shows a huge dragon clutching and gnawing diamonds. It's a nice image but I would just like to point out that there is no dragon in the story and the only diamond in the book is the name of a town. If I were a paid-up Ann McCaffrey or Christopher Paolini fan and had bought this handsome hardback on the jacket's promise, I might want my money back!
His current bluster, vagueness and lack of precision make him look like a man with something to hide - a case of 'argument weak, shout louder'.
Anyway, here is a scrapbooking page I have made for Sarah Hurley's 'tags and tickets' challenge this fortnight. I used her Halloween papers as my frames for my photos and her journalling tag to write on, plus a 'Hope' ticket from the Steampunk CD on a base of Bling 12x12 cardstock.
Strangest of all, the other Prince - the unmarried one - is a Carnatic classical singer who has performed in Nashville, and has sent me a flurry of emails since that evening. So maybe I will have royal email buddy.
So, some random things about ME…..(i mean only 7)…
Less perfect.
Upon graduation in 2003, Tanya began working full time at Wealth Management Group, LLC in Danvers, MA & continued her passion for performing. She spent the ’05, ’06, and ’07 seasons cheering for New England’s favorite Professional Football Team. During her years with the team she was selected to travel overseas with the Air Force Reserves to entertain troops from all branches of the military. Tanya and five other women from her squad visited Iraq, Afghanistan, Turkey, Germany, and Qatar. She was also selected as one of 8 women to travel to China in 2007 to promote American Football. In addition Tanya was a Boston Bruins Ice Girl for the the 2008-2009 season.
When canyons were mountains and oceans were raindrops, I loved you. When the stars blink out of existence, I'll still love you.
In September, we enjoyed a week of the hottest days of the year. After an unusually cool summer, this was a much needed way to end the season. I tackled the GRE and then immediately started fall quarter. Yikes, that still makes me exhausted thinking about it.
4 tbh thick coconut cream/milk
--Leave some comments!
Alan Paul
As I write this, I realize this applies to almost all learning, not just language. So these habits might help with the life-long learning that a happy and successful life requires. Do you recognize these steps from your own experience? When did you last consciously follow these steps? What happened?!
4. A paper on animal testing I wrote with a hangover the size of the Good Year Blimp my sophomore year of college
and i really got the feeling i don't have enough in stock...
I am excited about this change in my life I want to live more sustainably and I want to teach my daughter to also live as sustainably as possible. The hardest part for me will be when I need to take my daughter somewhere. I see many people with their kids in their bike trailer but I won’t do that because I don’t trust motorists enough. Another hard part will be drying clothes during these beginning days of summer.
Jimi Hendrix.
I was really happy with the result though. The texture is not as dense as regular NY cheesecake due to the addition of the fruit puree and I'm loving the tropical flavor! One thing I learn about making baked fruit-flavored cheesecake (at least for mango or mango passion fruit) is that the flavor concentrates and the color becomes stronger after baked. I'm making notes of all the things I need to modify for next time but until I get it perfected, I won't post the recipe just yet.
Lewis Schaffer: Eight Free Sisters Thom Dibdin
Well, this “friend” is just weird….on top of being just plain manipulative. There are so many specifics that I want to go into because you will laugh and cringe simultaneously. Like America’s Funniest Home Videos. But better. But I fear the wrath. It’s the ones that are patient enough to hit you hard over the long haul that you have to watch out for…it’s always the patient ones. Maybe once I have the Atlantic Ocean between us I will have the gall to go into more detail then…
Anyway, back to this picture, it reminded me a little of what I’ve just written. I’ve always regarded myself as the red connection. The outsider, the one that’s different. Made to be because the others are joined together and you’re left on your own. I’ve not really seen that as a problem, because I’m very independent, I’ve had to be!
Humility is something that does not come easily to human beings. Most of us feel at times that we are better than, or more deserving than, or more entitled than at least someone. However, humility is a crucial virtue when it comes to having a right relationship with God.
1 arrange
Day 5 – Denmark Berry Farm, Denmark Maze, and more wine tasting
Stunts: (7/10) – Some of the physical action in Wrath is actually surprisingly brutal and fun to watch. Even if Ares feels like he lacks a real sense of divinity for example, at least scenes where he and Perseus hash it out feel nicely executed and fun to watch. There’s some cool physical work involving fighting the chimera, and traversing Hepahestus’ labyrinth, and something that Wrath really did end up improving is the quality of the stunts. Clash seemed to rely on special effects more often for its action scenes, and at least Wrath manages to pull off some more old-fashioned battles every now and again, which makes them hit harder and feel more believable. That being said though, I found that some of the action scenes can be a bit choppy and difficult to follow, taking away from some of the otherwise impressive stunts. Even if there’s some patchy spots in some of the action scenes though, all in all, Wrath’s stuntwork is an improvement over the original film, and that counts for something in a sequel.
Seriously, if something isn’t listed, it’s likely because of one of these reasons:
Julianna has been playing some kickass songs in class lately – one of which has really resonated with me. I’m totally not hip – so I had to Shazam it. (love that app!)
It was on that same afternoon I saw Paul Andrews. The heat had done little to compromise his dress sense. Although he wore shorts, his buttoned shirt made me, with my bare chest, feel somewhat under dressed, even for drinking lager in the park. He was looking for an ice-cream van; I told him I was looking for a new team to play for. When I explained the extent of the situation he was as surprised and disappointed as I could have expected Paul Andrews to be. He wondered off into the horizon looking for ice-cream with a sheepish look on his face.
This is the pergola at the back of the yard. The fence down the center of it marks the center of the yard. There is an old grape vine along the fence and M now has it tied to the pergola in order to train it along the top. He’s also planted grape vines on either end (where the wire cages are) and a lilac at the center front. In a couple of years, this will be a lovely shady place to sit on those hot summer afternoons.
Xypherous: Precisely. You are wise, Phreak.
Well, after our meeting with Pastor Gayle, God opened my mouth and gave me things to say to draw his people deeper into worshiping Him. As time moved along I started playing keyboard too. Isn’t God funny? Never say never to Him.
Applying soft paraffin additionally helps to get rid lice. Out of this process and diligent combing is usually not enough to get rid of these pests from your home. Cover your head with a shower cap and leave on overnight. What do I do if treatment fails? What to do when faced with an attack and what treatments recommended as effective? What sort of insect you can expect to see and how you can prevent infestation of head lice? You should didn’t share brushes, combs, hair pieces, hats, bedding and clothing with someone who has lice.
There's only one thing we know for sure, even if some of us don't feel comfortable admitting it. They are, like all Muslims-even the best of them-mentally enslaved to the mentality of a savage, seventh century death cult, and the only peace possible to achieve with them is going to require the shedding of a hell of a lot more blood than has thus far been shed.
So here’s the plan. Fitness Magazine’s March issue has a “Dream Physique” plan that will help you get your “dream physique” in 21 days. So, that’s what I’m going to start with. This is a workout only plan. There is no meal plan to accompany it which is good because as I mentioned before this is not a diet. This workout was designed by Marco Borges and he says that a “five-days-a-week commitment is the key to both weight loss results and making a routine stick.” So I’m going to put that to the test because I need something that will stick and give me results. Here is a link to the moves that I’ll be performing each week: www.fitnessmagazine.com/turnaround This is Borges’ 21-day transformation plan:
Race Record Starts: 46; 1st: 6; 2nd: 10; 3rd: 5; Win & Place Prize Money: £751,521
If that little pup had stayed in the willows because of his fear, another predator would have gotten to him and his life would have ended. There is no need to remain in the world if you have stopped short of following Christ. Today is the day of Salvation and Jesus offers it freely. He died on the cross, shed ALL of His precious blood to pay the price for your sins and make a way for you to escape Hell. He died for you, you personally because He loves you. God raised Him up from the grave three days later and He rose victorious over death, hell and the grave. He has won life for everyone who will come to Him and place their faith in Him. As a Christian, sometimes we need to remind ourselves of this great Victor we have as a Saviour. There is NOTHING He has not conquered and defeated! My God is my Refuge, my Hope!
“HIS BAD.”
"We know things can change quickly, but it's obvious what we do from here on."
A cat settling in your lap or nearby who half-closes his eyes isn’t showing a lack of interest; rather, closed eyes imply total trust and relaxation. (And whether you’re saying something fascinating or boring doesn’t much matter to the cat anyway.)
Hello! I been thinking about sending in my story but i am a bit frightened that my boss will read it. But i know that you guys keep it confidential. Here it goes: I work for a family outside of LA and MB and DB usually work from home. They have a 19 month old boy (K). I make 15$ and work around 25 hrs. I am a young nanny but have worked for great families and have never had issues with any of them until now.
Lawyers representing Hines, of Upper Gornal, yesterday unsuccessfully attempted to persuade three appeal judges that the sentence was too long.
I think an important thing to consider in b&w is to not overdue the effect. After I do all my adjustments I take a break and work on a color image or just be away from the computer for a while. Come back, see that you over did it more than Fox news during election season and then bring it back to a more realistic value.
On Saturday, we went to our favorite hotel in the museum district, Hotel ZaZa. We got hour long massages at the ZaSpa and then spent the rest of the day longing by the pool---sipping mimosas and eating a delicious lunch!
Gin and tonic
Twitter: www.twitter.com/meggjensen
He denies all that he once could see
Thin Lizzy - Don't Believe A Word
Or the white milk of mothers who intended its pure draught
That’s the world our choices over the last three decades or so have been preparing for us, and for our grandchildren’s grandchildren. In such a world, the people who will have the most to offer their communities, their societies, and the biosphere that supports all our lives will be those who have the courage, now, to walk away from the consumer economy and its smorgasbord of dubious pleasures, and learn, now, how to get by with less, use their own capacities of body and mind, and work with the patterns and processes of nature. For the time being—specifically, until we get close enough to the crisis period that even the most nonviolent challenge to the existing order calls down massive violence in response—protest can still accomplish goals worth pursuing, especially if activists wake up once again to the power of personal example; over the longer run, though, it’s the change on the individual, family, and community level that so many of today’s activists reject as pointless that have the most to offer the world.
Like the soldier - is his love secret, or missed, as he is away from home?
Me and my high-school friends had our yearly out-of-country trip last Feb 10-16. Our destination would be Bali, Indonesia but since there are no direct flights from Manila to Bali, we booked flight going to Jakarta, and then stay there for about a day and then go to Bali.
We think we're isolated and absorbed in our own activities. We don't believe we belong to a larger realm. Why should we? Our vision extends only to as far as we can see. But this is one of those times we need to stop seeing, and just think about what we can't. Every incident eminates ripples beyond our own sphere.
And you think it stopped there? The final sweet course was a heavenly honey maize cake. Served with sweet corn and smoked meringue swimming in a shallow milk and honey bath. So basically we rolled home. Full as eggs… and running out of petrol. Thankfully we got home. And that was that weekend.
Red Hibiscus & Acai Lotion Soap – This softly scented Handmade Lotion Soap has a pale pink swirl in it which looks like a breath of pink breeze. Beautiful to look at in a soap dish as well as wonderful to use at a sink, in the shower, or bath.
This morning Sadie didn’t want to wake up
Good luck, my dear friend. This particular Mercury retrograde is retrograde in your sign! All kinds of people, information, and events from the past are swirling around you now. Ex-partners might be on the scene. But on a day-to-day basis, so many details in your life seem to be piling up, you feel like you're losing control. You forget things, misplace things, or lose things. You might be blowing appointments, or held up with delays, or just feel generally overwhelmed by life. Don't worry! We all have of these times when we are up to our armpits in alligators. Remind yourself that this will pass. (Especially if you drink a lot of water.) A month from now - all this is a memory.
I'm aware that some people believe that God sends hardships to test them this way. We lose people we love, we suffer great disappointments in life and grieve over losses. Personally, I don't believe God sends these things.
You both wrote the fictional parts of this documentary and directed it – what made you want to focus on this particular subject in the first place?
I've been asked one time or another by those who are curious about the path that I have chosen. Some have asked me, "You're not a Christian and you don't follow Christian rules, what are you, a devil worshiper?" I've also been told once or twice, "It is stated in the Bible that thou shalt not suffer a witch to live." And my personal favorite, "You can do magic? Do you do black or white magic?"
A terrible community constitutes itself in opposition to an opponent and, in that opposition, closes in on itself and begins to rot. Some say that Olympia, once home to ELF cells, the diffuse network of Port Militarization Resistance, and a broad community of anarchists, has become little more than a stale, dusty closet, a cafe-to-show circuit, a green-washed, gentrifying haven of the left. In short, a terrible community. COMMUNE is an experiment. On the negative side, it exposes that Olympia runs business as usual despite its high activist-per-capita ratio and radical reputation. But the film also reveals the existence of many different communes, spreading on their own, outside of anarchist or radical circles.
because that was the question about his girl
She is very much so the same sweet mare that she was before, but more alert and very protective of the colt. She bumped herself up several ranks for the sake of the baby - before she was at the bottom of the back, and now she is giving the other mare that she is turned out with (who was highly ranked above her) some serious grief about getting too close to her baby. The colt himself is very inquisitive and curious and cute - I like him. I like her a heck of a lot more, and having him around means I can't exactly just take her out and groom her whenever I want, but there you are. At some point he'll be bigger, and then we can see about getting her back to being handled a bit more.
Numero 2: Real piñatas are exciting and dangerous. Someone usually ends up crying from being clunked on the head. Kids are let loose to grab all the candy they can, by means fair or foul. The piñatas I’ve been to here (admittedly, most of which I was hosting) tend to be more “fair” with Moms evenly dividing out the candy afterwards….heh heh, and making sure no one gets clobbered. I’ve heard that in Mexico piñatas can still be made out of clay pots…that would definitely add an element of danger, with shards flying into the group of children!
by Zak Ellison
Then it's time for the most important part: walking the runway. A couple of seconds before it was my turn, I got a little bit nervous – what if I fall down? But the moment when I stood there, with all those people looking at me, I felt very confident. 'Don't think and look straight ahead ' was all that went trough my head, only the moment when I turned around and walked away I realised that I didn't fell, and my shoes and dress were still at the right place! Great! Then off to the backstage again were I had to change quickly into the next outfit, time for the next round!
- It must have fallen out when I hit that bump.
Luckily, being a holiday for much of the country, traffic was light and the horror only lasted 15 minutes before we arrived at the office. Swallowing big gulps of fresh air I got out of the cab and shakily handed over the fare...."keep the change mate" I tell him, "have a good one, drive safely". "Very good, very good" I hear him saying as I slammed the door shut and on legs like snapped candles ,walked towards the building. I would be passing on breakfast....
Blogging can be a wonderfully versatile form of self (and public) expression: you can use it as a journal; to showcase your art (photography, painting, comics, short stories, longer stories...); to share a subject you're knowledgeable about, or to document the process as you learn about a brand new subject; to keep people up-to-date on a community project; to provide support and information, to make connections with others, and a thousand other uses. Basically? Blogging is really cool! In this workshop, we'll aim to have every attendee figure out what they want their blog to be about, then set up an account and blog with Blogger (a free platform that lets you create and customize blogs). We'll also dicuss networking with other bloggers, building a readership, and other relevant blogging basics. Though this is a one time workshop, there's the possibility, if attendees are interested, in continuing to learn and share through a blogging club. Experienced bloggers who want to share their knowledge and experience are also very welcome to attend!
I think I might have lost my will to blog. I sit in front of my computer and there’s just nothing. Not an inkling of creativity not a whisper of a word. Is this the end of Love and Stuff? Please say it isn’t so! (Gosh I’m such a drama queen)
So if you have been anywhere near sunshine lately, start wearing your sunblock and be safe.
Ink: Chalkboard (Chestnut Roane) and Memento Pear Tart
I adhere the DSP onto the flap of the purse and then ran the purse through the Vintage Wallpaper embossing folder. To do this you actually have to run it through the big shot twice to cover the entire purse with texture. I used the Paper Piercer to pierce a hole in the top of both of the sides of the bag and the front of the bag just under the slit. Then you simply put a piece of sticky strip on the two side tabs, fold on the score lines, and adhere the tabs inside the front and back of the purse to form it. Super easy!
It won't be truthful to say everything went according to the plan... Ordy was under the impression that their hubbies would be in tow- half way to Tennessee I got a text that said it was "us girls".... ruh-roh. I didn't even know how to break the news to Ordy... so I didn't. Poor guy got blindsided when we pulled up to Laina's cabin and there were no boys in sight... He thought I suckered him into a girl's trip! Aw, I would never ever ever do that!!! After a five minute pow-wow and me explaining myself to him, he really did put his game face on and was a real trooper! Another reason why I am obsessed with that boy, he woke up at 5 am, picked me up, and drove me to Tennessee just to go thrifting with a bunch of girls. He's the best.
But anywho, for IDUD, I wanted to show her more ladylike. She may be a vixen to men, but she doesn't seem to have any particular dislike of women. Other then if they jack with her plants. so I did Poison Ivy on her way to the Garden Club. I think she'd adore it. No clear face in any of the pictures, because I wanted it dark and like the dark nature of women. So much imagery of Poison Ivy seems to be that, kind of a mother nature thing.
Once and a while you come across a hotel that is not just a place to stay and sleep but a place to become increasingly obsessed with within the first 40 minutes you're there. You can't blame me. There are golden anchors dangling from balconies, pewter tubs you could drown in in every room with bubble bath and roses all around, the warmest coziest white towels everywhere you look, movie selections, an outdoor light wood patio surrounded by vines looking out into the industrial remanence of the sky at sundown. The bed.... I can't even get near it because i am 100% sure that if i put one foot on it i'll sleep for a week straight. There is a bright white tiled shower that feels like you're standing in the middle of a tropical storm naked. Washing yourself with coconut & vanilla shampoo. The door to our room leads straight downstairs to the back door of the Pub. Since 1841, The Fox and Anchor is tucked away on a beautiful ancient English street, cobbled and uneven and welcoming to everyone.
workout: 40 minutes of 10 Minute Solution Pilates on Netflix (4, 10 min segments - abs, sculpt, burn, flexibility)
At the time:
Bobby was working late - I knew our anniversary was the next day but I hadn't gotten him a card yet. My son needed a new lunch box because he'd lost his last year, so I used that as an excuse to run to the store at almost 8 p.m.
Today, we seem to have reached a turning point. Perhaps not a conscious one, but just like the changes brought about by rising wealth, an inevitable one. The money has run out, the opportunities for the individual have declined and many people are perhaps waking up to what has gone, and just how much we really rely on each other. Yet, in wishing for old ideas of community to return, we must also be careful not to look down those terraced streets with rose-tinted spectacles.
So 3 biopsies later and some bandages slapped on, I left and went and picked up Vince. And with the regular chaos of the rest of the day, I completely forgot all about them. They were still numb, so I didn’t even feel the areas until right around when we were hurrying to get to soccer practice on time.
Blank stare and a flat “no.” And with that, I realize this is going to become joke fodder: Unbelievably Bizarre Films Didion Thinks She Can Make Me Watch.
These days, crazes seem built to last. But back then, one after another passed through our lives: frisbees, spacehoppers, skateboards - you name it, we had it. What we never had, though don't think we didn't toy with the idea, was our own pair of roller skates.
The engineer said: Must have run away. Wake everyone up.
There was also this cool souvenir from Rigi Kulm. It is a note pad made of celluloid with a tiny pencil on a string. There are still notes on some of the celluloid pages.
The danger isn’t in the television. It just isn’t.
Well, here's my Kindle book loot and adventures thus far ...
Dec 29th – feels like a kid sneaking to get online. 3 hilarious things from today - 1) took the forever long dirt road here & stopped to pick about 4 people when they yelled to the ones behind them & so on. Next thing we know there are 25+ back there, 2) saw a chicken & a goat fight AND have it on video, 3) took a 15 min shower & as soon as George got in, the power went off. You should've heard him scream. Bahaha! Night!
“Traditional sensors take in a single point measurement, giving a very accurate measurement that might be by a roadside.
Gazette Bulletin number CR:
Doyle prodded, “So, what’s the plan? The press will be merciless when they find out she left you. It’ll make front page headlines all over the country, which, I might add, won’t do your image any good. We need to come up with a plausible story to head this off.”
Well someone was impressed by my insightful copy, because CBS Outdoor's PR company, Edelman, invited me to the awards that took place last night at the Getty Gallery (thanks, Katie, and hello Will).
President Zardari had planned a private visit to visit the holy shrine at Ajmer—a much revered Sufi saint’s burial place. Obviously he hoped that the Indians would do something besides just extend courtesy and protocol. There are those who think that the visit to the shrine was orchestrated to create an opportunity for a meeting where the two leaders could speak frankly. If this was not the case then the options for the Indians were to just let it remain a private visit or to extend an invitation for an official visit with all its implications or to do what they did—turn it into a kind of working visit. This worked well because from all accounts the visit was a success and achieved much in terms of understanding and trust. The Indians seem to have come to the conclusion that Mr Zardari and his son are people they can work with.
Level 14: Reduces the damage received from the enemies by 12%.
I should trust myself more. This is a challenge because I haven’t been very self-aware in the past. I think this is linked to my devaluation of my self-worth. Due to my abuse I haven’t felt that I was very valuable, so trusting my own feelings over other’s opinions still is a challenge. So maybe this is God telling me to use the gift of wisdom he has given me. Maybe my reluctance to continue therapy with T is His way of telling me that I need to find someone else.
I see His love and mercy
Amongst other things, the training programs have the below features:
-I am getting tired.
I know that as an unpublished writer, I won’t have anything to show or assure you that my work is suitable. But that does not mean it is not good; it just means I may have fresh or new ideas.
if I don’t say a word.
I’ve been recycling glass jars by slowly replacing the smaller plastic food containers we’ve been using. But, despite having my husband really go at that sticky residue, we just couldn’t get it all off. Enter the internet where I found various suggestions including peanut butter. I thought “Why not?” and gave it a try. Worked brilliantly! Smooth some on the jar, use a rag or one of those scrubber sponges to go over the area, and rinse. Who knew? (Apparently a lot of people – just not me.)
I have one more room to dust and vacuum before I call it quits for the day. If you drop in over Easter weekend, you are welcome in any of the main floor rooms but don't you dare go upstairs! The beds will be made but I can't guarantee that bunnies won't be up there to greet you, and they won't be the Easter variety. I think this one has become a permanent resident but I don't remember buying her that coffee mug.
Yes! For me it was important and empowering. I had a good friend Terry that had gone through it a year before. I immediately felt I should have been more sympathetic to her, listened to her better, and I should have asked more questions. But she understood, never felt I was insensitive, and she volunteered to answer every tiny question I had, happily.
To A-Z
In 2001 I had my twins and came home to Scotland; at around the same time I discovered YA books (I bought them on the pretence of building a library for my kids’ future, but read them all myself). YA was in this golden age, and I found it was what I really wanted to write. I also discovered manuscript advice services like Hilary Johnson’s, and I can’t recommend them highly enough.
Notes: Can be substituted for your quarterly financial report, but only once every third quarter or so. Any more than that and they’ll catch on.
This Psalm is a beatitude and it stands at the front of our most ancient song book/book of prayers. The Psalmist puts before us two paths. On one path walks the blessed person; on the other walks the wicked. And if the blessed one never steps foot onto the path of the wicked, we can be sure and certain that the wicked person never steps foot on the path of the righteous person. The Lord watches over the way of the righteous, but the way of the wicked? It appears not so much since their way will be destroyed.
Sports chatter is a very common subject for small talk and is a plague upon my existence. There is no good way to handle the situation, but invariably it happens to me almost every day. Not many situations are more awkward and disconcerting for me
Birth daughter looking for birthmother or relatives. I was born on the (date removed), in Montreal, giving name at birth was Brenna.
One of the things our Kaiser Optifast group leader emphasizes, especially now that we are out of the Phase 1 rapid weight loss phase, is that to live with a meal plan for the long-term, it has to be foods we like! If we are eating stuff to lose weight or maintain weight loss but we don’t feel happy and satisfied, or we are trying to keep eating stuff we don’t care for, it won’t work for the long-term. We’ll get bored, or feel deprived, and want variety, treats, etc. It’s human nature, since humans are basically pleasure-driven creatures…
Many girls wish that they could magically get their ex-boyfriend to like them again, or even for something as simple as bigger boobs and longer hair. If given the chance I’m sure that we’d all change something about ourselves or our lives so when our heroine Lex and her best friend George play a mysterious online Sims like game starring not only themselves but also their group of friends who can blame them for tinkering around with the online settings? Giving themselves a better image and adding a few wishful thinking improvements regarding who likes who in the group. But when what’s happening in the game starts also unexplainably happening in real life too Lex and George feel like they’ve won the jackpot. They have ultimate control over their friend’s looks, love lives and even personalities and can change things for the better right at their fingertips. But sometimes what we think we want isn’t always what we need which is something that Luisa Plaja explores to extremes in this weirdly wonderful story.
We also had the opportunity of going on late night hikes and seeing (or as much as we could!) the landscape in a different perspective. Of course there was the occasional scream, but it was all in good fun!
Informational session: An informational session consisting of several presentations and discussion will be held from 2 p.m. to 4:30 p.m. May 25 in Mass Media and Technology Hall Auditorium. During this informational session, several topics will be discussed, including the history of Bosnia and Herzegovina, the composition and breakup of the former Yugoslavia, the war and genocide in Bosnia between 1992 and 1995, Islam and Culture in Bosnia, and contemporary Bosnian life in America.
As they got closer I stepped clear of that girl and unzipped my jacket at those two guys. When I did the guy threw down the bottle and they walked by cussing at me. If someone challenges you after you indicate you are armed, say "I don't have a gun." Then they will know you do.
I asked 002 to watch after the twins. I can't remember if it was while I went to work or if it was while I went to a doctor's appointment with 007. I was taking them to someone's house to watch them and asked 002 to help them not be sad while I was gone. I liked to give her something to do because it helped her stay focused and not think about why I wasn't there.
"Red Meat Does Not Raise Risk of Cancer, Heart Disease"
This book is bursting with fascinating facts about daily life in the 1300′s- facts that might not be mentioned in other history books. Some of the common misconceptions of 14th century people are challenged as well- the great unwashed that eat slop? Barbarians that kill and mutilate without a second thought? This myths are shown to be untrue, with evidence and argument to back it up. The dialogue reads easily, is uncomplicated and appeals to anyone- whether they are new to the 14th century, or a regular visitor.
DSLR cameras capture their images on a silicon semiconductor referred to as a “image sensor.” Digital Single Lens Reflex (DSLR) cameras use either a CCD (Charge Coupled Device) or CMOS (Complementary metal–oxide–semiconductor) image sensor. Most point and shoot cameras use a CCD sensor (excluding cameras like the Nikon D3000) while almost all DSLR’s use a CMOS image sensor. CMOS image sensors derive their name from the way they are manufactured. They are cut from a CMOS wafer which is cheaper to produce then a CCD wafer, provides less power consumption, and also allow for more involved circuitry along side of the photosite array.
"The good son"
I'm hoping that all changes soon!!
Edit - he just called me up the garden to help him save a baby blackbird who got stuck in his strawberry net so the nature loving boy is still there , oh and he resuscitated his gold fish the other day - never have I seen a fish be bought back to life - this kid has talent lol :-)
So, the next day, I plopped myself down at the table at lunch and told the lunch bunch the “Vickie story.” When they finished laughing hysterically at me, one of my friends (I shall call her Sharon), had the nerve to ask me, after she wiped the laughing tears from her eyes. “So, are you going to write to the real Ale-Alejandro?” And my answer, in a school building, in a professional teacher voice, was, “Are you F*cking kidding me?????” And they all cracked up again.
Mayhem - Inesse Ray Keith Remix (Face Records)
41. Between Here and Forever Elizabeth Scott
Notes on Ingredients: I used Bellringer gin and Absinthe Verte de Fougerolles
to paint it, i covered the surface of the mirror with paper, being sure to tuck it in between the frame and the mirror.
When asked early this month whether Washington believed that the Islamist party would uphold the treaty, State Department spokeswoman Victoria Nuland said that the party “has made commitments to us in this regard.”
I would spread the cloths under your feet:
6. My World Is Empty Without You
Good. Now you’ve got some goals; some things you know you want to change. But one of the biggest problems for people when setting SMART goals is the T: Time-sensitive. They just can’t answer for themselves one big question: when!?! When will you hit that goal by? - and as they start trying to answer the question of when the excuses and “reasons” start popping up (reason is just code for excuse, right?).
I realize that this is a rather extensive list and that even the most super of Santas may have trouble with it. Therefore, I am prepared to accept delivery no later than September 4th, 2010.
(If you decided to prep this in advance, refrigerate the mixture at this point until ready to continue.)
We spent the entire morning at the Grand Palace. It was great to recapture my love of the place which I had kind of lost having been there so many times when we had visitors.
powdered sugar for coating
As you may know know I'm taking part in the first round of Marsha Neal's 'Silk Color Palette Challenge' which gives you the opportunity to create your own palette from Marsha's silks using a photographic image as inspiration. It's good fun and a great way to get those creative juices flowing plus participants have the chance to win fabulous goodies. So, as a second giveaway I'm offering a bundle of silk in my own 'Souks of Marrakesh' colour palette to one random winner who shares Marsha's 'Silk Color Palette Challenge' blog page which you'll find here on their own blog or facebook page. Please make sure you leave a separate entry for this indicating that it is for the silk bundle draw.
3. Love Me With All Your Heart
and a drop of cream to colour the brew
a rewind reality check
As she crossed the room, the clapping hands ringing in her ears, she risked the briefest glance at the man in the second row. But even in that instant, she felt his eyes breach the barricade she’d constructed around herself so long ago, that bulwark about her soul that isolated her from the hurtful world outside.
Don't forget that you still have time to enter our first eclectic Challenge. You have an entire weekend, too. Will you accept the challenge? What can you create with some Distress Ink, some dies and en egg carton. The E-Team wants to see. You can view some of the entires and upload your own creation HERE.
We advise the regional countries against providing a basis for their presence,”foreign ministry spokesman Ramin Mehmanparast told reporters.
between stale coffee and cheap talk
sure that Santa Claus would bring it to her.' I
Tim and Laurie Thornton amazed us as they skillfully played, sang and told stories of what the Lord had done in their lives. At one point in the concert, my mind started to drift and the thoughts began to eat away at my brain, "What if it doesn't work out? What if he breaks my heart? What if this isn't right?" And in that moment I heard the Lord whisper to me, "He is your gift." All of the sudden a million other questions entered my mind, "For now? For this year? Forever?" But no answer was given... just that he was my gift.
* But tonight, I need to take my contacts out, put on my favorite black lounge pants, and lounge.
And nature is heartbeat,
“Let me see your passport.” he demanded.
Merry Christmas!! The Yuletide is one of my favorite seasons. The caroling, the presents, the repetitive television specials, I love all of it. But the joy of Christmas hides a darker, more dangerous element, an element which threatens the lives of people around the world. Most people are sadly unaware these dangers, so I’ve taken it upon myself to educate the general public. I’m referring, of course, to the Krampus, the monster of Christmas.
You know how I’m a picky eater and I won’t eat stuff simply because I don’t like the sound of it? Well, on Saturday I met my BFF Lisa Gioia-Acres and her cooler-than-moi daughter, Adrian, for lunch at the Texas de Brazil steakhouse in Town Square. Why so fancy-schmancy? It was Adrian’s birthday and she’s worth it.
On the drive to my son’s basketball game, I thought I saw a cloud that looked like a big cotton ball……it was quite shocking…..
Sam likes One Direction… Is that why Freddie’s joining a band? Pretzels for thought…
His view from behind that bland skin
These are so yummy! Gluten free super filling pancakes and a really healthy option for a lunch of light dinner..
- Krampus Legend and Arts Workshop (KLAW): $800.00 for the Krampus Legend and Arts Workshop that will include films, puppet shows, a parade and more to promote the legend of the Krampus.
2. Set Behavioral Boundaries
As sad as it is, I have several friends that have had much darker days than I. Many, such as the one above, have had not been able to take their babies home from the hospital. One, very recently, lost his four year old son in a tragic accident. Another lost the love of her life to breast cancer 10 months ago (still missing you Jen, love you Cathy).
They must understand that Obama's win did not symbolise the victory of any racial group. It was a triumph of a society which strives to ensure that all citizens have the opportunities they need to take responsibility for their lives, irrespective of the circumstances of their birth, and become the best they can be.
- party like a one year old
But with the weird and the bad, came good (as life usually does), I officially got in a relationship with...Will. Ha, I felt weird talking about him on my blog, but now, I don't care. It might've been a little sudden, but it didn't feel that way to us. I've known him for five years, and he's the greatest guy I've ever known. He treats me completely different than guys have in the past...and that means something to me. All my family and closest friends can see a change in me, in this guy, and that also confirmed it for me. The feelings I get with him are just so different, and yes, a little scary. I'm falling for him fast because it feels so effortlessly, but with that, you have your guard up. My step-mother Kim, told me it's okay to let yourself be vulnerable, and just feel what you are feeling. She's right. I say it every time, but everyone deserves a cleans slate, even if you have been hurt every single time. I'm scared, but I want to take this chance on something great. I teased Will the other day; in five years, we don't have one good picture with each other. Guess we'll just have to fix that won't we?! Just so thrilled with this. He gets me better than a lot of people do, and every day I find something else we have in common with one another. I love it, I truly do.
For the first time in franchise history, the Predators topped the Red Wings in points, thus giving Nashville home ice advantage. This isn’t, however, the first time Nashville and Detroit have faced one another in the first round of the playoffs. Nashville and Detroit met in both 2004 and 2008, but Detroit powered through both times, ending the Predators from the get-go. This year is different. Nashville has been predicted over Detroit in almost all circumstances, and for once, the Red Wings find themselves on the underdog side of the fence.
Mind you, I don’t let my kids to sit on the couch for hours on end every day. During the week (when I’m parenting solo) I limit the amount of time the TV is on. I do my best to keep them entertained with books, arts & crafts, dancing and playtime. However, when the dishes call or dinner needs to be prepared, I have no problem turning on my electronic-babysitter for 10-15 minutes at a time.
I am amazed at the difference having 0.25mils out makes. My band feels 100 times more comfortable and PBing is down to a minimum. And best of all, I really do feel full after eating even though I am not eating much.
On with the episode.
I don’t think the solution to the Groupthink process is to eliminate it. Collaborative work has brought about a lot good material. What needs to be eliminated or mitigated is the sense of anxiety of influence.
The Padawan is also doing great. She has passed her due date, and has now been promoted in status from externalized fetus to official baby. She even looks like one now, all rosy cheeks and chubby belly. The health visitor came a couple of days ago, and she was at her birth weight plus 10%. She’s eating very well, slurping down 100 mls at a time with no persuasion necessary. Just the opposite, we have to slow her down or she gets gripey. She actually slept for four hours last night. Four hours!!
-Jim Tiroch
The growing health consciousness of Americans is probably the most important reason for the surge of interest in vegetarianism. Nutrition experts have built up convincing evidence that there are major problems with the conventional American diet, which is centered around meat products that are high in cholesterol and saturated fat, while low in fiber. Heart disease, cancer and diabetes, which cause 68% of all deaths in America, are all believed to be influenced by diet.
Three children...14yo identical twin girls(adopted locally as infants) and a 7 yo boy(adopted from China in 2010). All are adopted. None look like me or my husband. We consider it a call from God to parent children. We don't feel proficient. It isn't the same.
It’s truly flabbergasting that this film was written and directed by the same guy that directed Body Heat and The Big Chill and that wrote Star Wars: Episode V – The Empire Strikes Back as well as Raiders of the Lost Ark. Those films, especially those last two, are just truly iconic cinematic gems, films that as soon as you hear their name a particular scene or moment or piece of music comes to mind; Darling Companion, on the other hand, seems to be the exact opposite of that for some reason. It’s the sort of film that you’ll have to think for a while to remember what it was when people ask you about just a few months from now, the kind of film that is just too mild-mannered for it to make any kind of impact, the kind of film in which the stakes are just too low for you to really care about what happens in it.
14 realized
Because he learned that the best way to trim down is to get physical, I don’t think he’ll ask me again what is three best diet pill on the market. Let me say that again: I don’t think hubby will ever ask me what the three best diet pills are on the market. There, that sounds better!
For 2012 we will have a raft of rules changes that will alter the look and performance of the car. For most of the new cars, we will immediately see the impact of the lower nose regulations. Then the big story of 2010-2011 of exhaust blown diffusers (EBDs) comes to an end with stringent exhaust placement rules and a further restriction on blown engine mappings.
I stopped trying Belgians by the time this one was widely available in Houston, but I couldn't pass it up for one reason, here about a month ago.
Millennial Behaviors and Higher Education Focus Group (Jam-Packed!) Richard Sweeney, New Jersey Institute of Technology focus group among Millennials, discussing these young people's characteristics: Direct, confident, inclusive and tolerant … Abstract thinkers, adaptive, organized and self-disciplined … READ LESS, digital natives/ gamers, want practical consumer choices and personalized/customized products … Impatient multi-taskers, experiential learners who seek balance in their lives. Focus group held among 12 college Millennials (born 1979-1994).
We’re here on this big blue ball for eighty years or so, I figure we may as well take that mind, that potential and those ideas of ours out for a spin and see what we can do.
We have seen that the book of Esther lays out a fairly accurate spiritual chronology of God’s gospel program. It begins with Vashti representing Israel. Then she is put away as Israel was at the cross. The gathering of virgins to Shushan relates to all those brought into the churches during the church age. The discovery of the rebellious plot of the 2 doorkeepers, and their judgment points to the end of the church age. The promotion of Haman and his desire to kill Mordecai and the Jews clearly relates to Satan taking his seat in the temple, and the image of the beast that was set up in the churches. Any not worshipping it were to be killed. The spiritual chronology continues up until May 21. Let’s see how the book of Esther makes the connection with the date of May 21. And in doing so, we will also see that May 21 is locked in as the beginning day of judgment.
1204 **D-III/26/1995. “A Return to Paradise Lost.” Sunday Platform Meeting, The Ethical Humanist Society of Chicago, Evanston, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-1996(5), above, pp. 320-31.)
Phone: (212)782-3890
Polished
Chuck grew up and now works for the government. He's currently figuring out how to give us our money back.
Keep in mind that small children can be rascals. All you have to do is leave them unattended a minute playing by the car when they realize they left their favorite toy inside. Next thing you know they are playing in the car w/out realizing how hot is and perhaps even trap themselves inside. When we have that mom moment "hey it's too quiet, what's wrong?" it may be too late.
It's not so much I am missing you.
Remember how you worked for, like, 2 weeks the you stopped?
Lee Sander, Executive Director, MTA
This GOP Fembot/televangelist/CIA-controlled asset was raised in tightly structured military environment, a living “Caribou Barbie Doll” — initial early age base trauma inflicted in Sandpoint Idaho, then transplanted to Alaska at three yrs old – only travelled outside U.S. once before Hong Kong trip in 2009 –a blank slate for her programmers/handlers to use while pimping her out, riding wave of angst, driven by fear/ignorance/economic losses suffered by rabid fans, deluded as to her origins/purpose — SarahPac, phony Legal Defense Fund, Harper Collins book tour, speaking fees @ $100-200K each — Alaskan MK Kitty continues to fill coffers of Bilderberger Rupert Murdoch’s media empire…
Projects look yummy don't they? I haven't done any stringing with Soft Flex wire in quite awhile. Patel puts a new spin on it and I can't wait to dive in. Are there any techniques you haven't tried in awhile?
The Kay Bob’s name is a play on kebabs. The meat line-up is kebab-esque in preparation and it’s a simple choice of seven combinations right now. Each sandwich is a puffy, white, flat bread wrap. The Tammie Rae brings ties together barbecue chicken, Cole slaw and melted Jack cheese. It’s straightforward and satisfying. The Uncle Bob is a burger wrapped up with lettuce, tomato and your choice of sauce. The horseradish sauce is a bit tame, but the quality of the local beef stands out with a pleasant sweetness. The sides include crispy and thick-cut sweet potato chips; a mellow and chilled black bean and corn salad; skinny hand-cut fries; and flavorful sweet sesame slaw with a crunch from Raman.
...that if I see one more post/tweet/status update about losing weight I might barf.
Not only did my boys love this book but I enjoyed it too. My kids love it when we read the same book. I love it because we sit down and chat about the book and I'm often surprised at how much detail they remember that my old brain forgets!
They always have sources who materialise just in time in an underground parking lot, and hand them big brown envelopes with photos and documents that help them put together that big story just ahead of the newspaper’s deadline. If only life were that simple.
2 Small Of Destroyer (5:20)
82. Skeleton Staff-Psychomorphism (Swizzle)
Got Mono in college.
The protagonist, Steve, played by Ryan Gosling says:
Oh the indignity.
I am a barefoot enthusiast, and have practically given up wearing shoes all together! For many years I described my brand of spiritual connectedness as standing barefoot on a sun-warmed stone in the middle of a cold rushing stream. I have done just that in many streams and places in the northern hemisphere. If I knew then what I know now, the four months I spent hiking along the Appalachian Trail would have been done barefoot. No doubt the voyage of Simplicity to the southern latitudes will be shoeless.
Medhat A, el-Sharkawy MM, Shaaban MM, Makhlouf MM, Ganhein SE. Acute viral hepatitis in pregnancy. Int J Gynaecol Obstet 1993; 40: 25-31.
1/2 cup coconut milk
If you've never had Toll House Pie, we highly recommend it. It is super easy to make too and requires no chopping to prepare (a big plus in my book!) I didn't take any pictures as I was preparing it but the evidence was all over Ryan's face. So if you're looking for a new dessert idea, here you go!
So, did you miss me last Wednesday? I was on my Jolly Holidays. We spent a fabulous week in London doing the "Tourist Thing"!!! We saw all the sights Buckingham Palace, Westminster Abbey, Big Ben, Downing Street, Tower Bridge etc. We visited Kew Gardens, The Science Museum, The Royal Observatory at Greenwich and The British Museum. Of course we also had time for some serious shopping too - Harrods, Fortnum & Masons, Covent Garden and Hamleys to name a few. I even managed a trip to Blade Rubber Stamps - a great rubber stamp and craft shop in Holborn!!!
It was not the first time that Sharifi had appeared in court on a rape charge - in 2009 he was jailed for a minimum of seven years for the abduction and sexual assault of a woman on Christmas Eve, 2008 - five days after he had raped the teenager.
Another find off Namibia's central coast called Delta Prospect contained recoverable resources of up to two billion barrels of oil, by Arcadia Expro (AEN) Namibia and British firm Tower Resources, he said.
He is strangely divorced from the lives of the people whose videos are up on the screen. Their personal stories are irrelevant. Their fate is up to God. He sees only one thing in his daily obsession: Judgment Day is coming. The Bible Guarantees it.
I can practice loving-kindness with everyone but me. And that's okay.
The whole concert reminded me strongly of the “Dreigroschenoper”, but less interesting, less captivating, less haunting. In short: I am glad I had a chance to attend this free concert, but unlike a large part of the audience, I was not enchanted. I am totally not tempted to attend any of the concerts in Rotterdam where the complete program will be performed.
Here are the two projects that were chosen.
December 22, 2011 ~ Social worker came for her first of four homestudy visits.
I would also appreciate prayer for the 3 remaining big events of this year: a pastors/leaders conference with Michael Wells, an international speaker who speaks on the Abiding Life in Christ (Oct. 6-8), a camp for the blind (Oct. 21-22) and a conference for women (Nov. 11-13).
Songs : Kyuhyun – The Way to Break Up & Late Autumn
Stayin’ far behind without you
VARIANT by Robison Wells is a PW best Book of the Year, and Robison is a PW Flying Start.
After a brief hiatus for the holiday's, being busy in general and a little time for some beer brewing research, the last 2 weekends I have brewed small batches (1 gallon each) of beer. These 2 were my first attempt at a all-grain recipe. There really wasn't much difference in the process other than the straining and sparging of the grains.
A nation that can give you variety
Despite a size disadvantage (Lampron, who weighed in at 172 lbs, usually competes at Welterweight, while Dellow, 179 lbs, usually fights closer to Middleweight), Lampron handled Dellow, earning a unanimous decision from the judges, and improving to 7-3 as an amateur. Dellow fell to 3-2.
Action: And as you probably know, they manage to get the young man out from under the car, saving his life. It’s also pretty obvious that these responders needed to observe, assess, take action, and then cycle back through Observe (this isn’t working), Assess (he’s still trapped and alive), Options (try different angles, get more people involved),
4. Tim Duncan vs. Al Jefferson
2010.08.31 Somalia Mogadishu 8 14 Five men and three women are taken down by al-Shabaab bombers.
Sirantha Jax is a “Jumper,” a woman who possesses the unique genetic makeup needed to navigate faster than light ships through grimspace. With no tolerance for political diplomacy, she quits her ambassador post so she can get back to saving the universe the way she does best—by mouthing off and kicking butt.
I'm taking off for a long weekend to my parents' house so I won't be around until next week. Hope everyone enjoys their weekend! xox.
While the Blip Festival and the chiptune scene grow larger every year, chip artist continue to be vexed by the common assumption that what they do is some sort of novelty, or worse, just “video game music.” To many artists, the hardware itself is more of an instrument than a game machine, and lumping all music made with a Game Boy into one oversimplified category is akin to claiming that all music made with a guitar is essentially the same.
This is going to be a confusing, multidimensional, multifactional war with blacks against whites, African tribes against African tribes, local blacks against foreign blacks, opportunistic criminal gangs going rampant in between, killings just for the hell of it. They'll target security complexes, because they are easy targets, block the entrances and wipe out everyone inside. They'd go from house to house shooting everyone they meet.
Like it is, whatever way you wish to say
Oldboy is the second film in Chan Wook Park's "Vengeance" trilogy. (The other two being, Sympathy for Mr. Vengeance and Lady Vengeance) That being said, all three of the films stand alone and are only linked in that each is a meditation on Vengeance and the fact that none of the films give a color by numbers revenge story. The Oldboy story is based on Japanese manga. Typically a revenge film is one man addressing a great wrong, but Park shows us a complex world of equally complex characters, where many may have arguable rights to revenge, but seeking it seldom does anyone any good only escalating the atrocities and pain for all parties.
but mostly I think it's beliefs neither
Video Game Old school Frogger
In our text the apostle had opportunity to admonish all concerned but no one would listen. That word “admonish” means to warn. They might have considered him a mere pessimist. After all, he was but a prisoner and usually prisoners have a hidden agenda – like escape. What they might not have realized was that Paul had a greater desire to go toRomethan any of them.
with my hands lifted to Your throne. Let my worship ascend to You as sweet
On Thursday, they had pool play. They started the tournament by beating University of Northern Colorado 25-18. In their next match they lost to University of Texas 26-22. To finish of pool play, they beat LSU 30-14.
Paddles he shared with family and friends as he introduced them to the sport.
Judd
Right now they are spending the night in a cleaned out drawer of the filing cabinet (we want to make sure we can keep them warm through the night), but by day they will move into a more spacious box for a little more leg room. It’s a bit snug but that’s New York. You gotta live with a little less space.
Me: awesome, how far from home are you?
Bibliographic data: Publisher: Kluwer Law International, 2008. ISBNs 9041126430 and 13 9789041126436. Hardcover, xiv + 404 pages. Price £89. Rupture factor: moderate. Book's web page here.
I can teach you today that volunteering is a lot of work. But, it is also a lot of fun! Want to know how you can get involved and ignore your blog at the same time? Go to barackobama.com and sign up for an event near you.
Not as much as I've enjoyed your thoughtful answers: it's always a great pleasure to get a sneak peek behind the writer's practice and it is clear you've thought deeply about your own methods – it gives great hope to those who aspire. Elizabeth, the pleasure was truly all mine!
Long Reach Village Center
Gordon McCannel Aamoth, 32, New York, N.Y.
Accepting the premise that it's ludicrous to pretend to comprehensively cover the themes of perhaps the most important turning point in our nation's history in 30 minutes, we do try to talk about what we think was lost in 1865, what is always lost when there is change, and the role of Catholics and the Papacy in and with the Confederacy.
I will try to keep this updated but seeing as how Taylor does not blog and I will be out of commission I can't promise updates tomorrow. I'm going to try Facebook updating tomorrow though. So stay tuned! Thanks in advance for the prayers!
A special thanks to Shelley at I Miss My Sanity. Although she can't donate she helped spread the word by blogging about the blood drive! Stop by and see what her blog is all about and send a big heartfelt thanks!
Much credit to Oliver La Farge, who continues to surprise me by saying something interesting and even possibly relevant about the situation for Native Americans in the early 1930s. I know I came in with low expectations, so it’s not as though I’m reading Bury My Heart at Wounded Knee. But Laughing Boy is proving very immersive in what feels to me (based on my limited historical knowledge) like a realistic scenario for young Native Americans in the Southwest at the time. Laughing Boy’s story explores a lot of territory—what is expected of a man, how tensions between tribes (the Pah-Utes and the Navajo, principally) dominated their experience and allowed the “Americans” to play one off the other, etc. But I’m increasingly fascinated by Slim Girl, who’s proving to be a very complex young woman—raised in a boarding school (a place so awful, she tells Laughing Boy on their wedding night to kill their children if the Americans ever come to take them off to a school), not quite “native” enough for the Navajo but never “white” enough for the Americans, savvy in business but unable to keep a lid on all her emotions. La Farge does a good job, I think, of drawing out her inner life. Here’s an extended example from immediately after she’s convinced Laughing Boy to elope with her:
I have mentioned before that my university didn’t offer anything in the way of mentoring schemes and only offered pro-bono work in my final year so I had very little access to local firms compared to some universities. A big disappointment.
If you do not want employees, what system are you using to ensure you are making personal contact with your clients consistently?
couldn’t hide the grief that circled
Envy. Do I envy the wealthy? Do my friends? None of us make a million dollars a year, but I have trouble conjuring up a recent conversation where one of us expressed envy toward those who do make that amount of money. I think the young man missed the point, it’s not about envy, but it is about fairness. We are in a big mess and we are all in the mess together, so if you are going to make cuts to social programs it is only fair to raise taxes on those who make over a million dollars a year too. Now I understand that life is not always fair. I also know that when you have a country full of people who see that the game is rigged and it’s not fair, you create a grave mistrust and mistrust leads to other problems. In a lot of instances that mistrust is already in place. Neither The Ryan Plan nor the Buffet Rule will become law. And they won’t become law because there is so much money in Washington that our elected officials are:
As we speak my dark ones i am waiting to hear the fate of my story "My Favorite Animal" which i submitted to Fearology 2. I know i will be waiting awhile as the deadline was ;last night and the editor informed us that he received 143 submissions of which i am 1. But im still excited if i make the cut this will be my first paid anthology and my first contributers copy :)
And it doesn't stink. Promise, Colin and I made sure to smell it.
Here’s an idea of an average few hours activity on my phone. Please note these are actual examples from texts which I received today. (Names have been changed).
Admittedly, I haven't written much lately in the blogosphere. But, I have been writing. On paper. With a pen.
As polls in recent years show, a majority of Israelis supports a two-state solution. And for good pragmatic reason: Israelis see a Palestinian state as an existential necessity for Israel itself, a means of preserving their country's Jewish majority and democratic identity.
3. BOOK YOUR OWN FLIGHTS FOR THE BEST PRICES. If you're not used to travelling, go with a travel agent. Otherwise, shop around online. I use bestflights.com.au. One year I flew to London return for A$900. And get on email lists, so you know when good deals come up. At the moment there's a price war to the US. You can fly to NY return for $900 or so (plus $200 or so taxes).
No wonder I'm exhausted, after working as business owner, being wife and managing my family duties, connecting with friends, helping guide Youth Group, and tutoring G for about 2 hours each night. Perhaps I should be babbling?
There are so many things I'm thankful for this week...
Bid me come to Thee above,
For the buns
02 - Because Of You
Work is going well. I've been working on some projects I'm enjoying and that are requiring me to use the ol' noodle in a good way. And I'm busy. Very, very busy. My annual (not really annual since I haven't had one since 12/09) performance review is coming up next week, so you know. There's that. Last time, I got a whopping 2% raise after enduring a 2-year salary freeze. Who knows what will happen this time. In this economy, I'm just incredibly thankful to have a job.
But, if I learn some of the fundamentals, if I learn how to read the music and what notes sound good together, if I begin to grasp the ideas of rhythm and timing, then I just might get a few of you to stick around.
Today he seems a little less willing. When I sit him on the potty, within 20 – 30 seconds, he’s saying “All done,” without having done anything in the potty. I’m making him sit for at least a couple of minutes, but (a) my experience yesterday indicated that if he’s going to do anything into the toilet, it’s going to be within the first few seconds, and (b) I don’t want to force him to sit on the potty longer than he’s willing to sit and thus make the pottying experience a negative one for him.
OMG, “RAPE EACH OTHER HETERO” — that has to go on a t-shirt somewhere. I picture a Jersey Shore cast member saying it to his other well ab-ed and tanned cohort: “My buddy was looking so good after that gym workout and tanning session that I almost cruised him in the locker room, but instead we raped each other hetero. Now, we’re going to the club to get some hos.” WHAT IN GOD’S NAME. I CAN’T. I CAN’T CONTINUE. Who knew poor test scores were a result of raping one another hetero. And if people are raping each other hetero, aren’t they solving her problem? You’re logic is being poorly translated from out of that tin foil, you Crazy Bag O’ Donuts. Wait, what logic?
Then today… I found THIS!
Thus began my obsession with finding the beauty in anything that is falling apart.
And of course, for most of us, the last decent photo we had taken of us was 20 years ago, when we looked so much younger and smoother skinned, and in many cases, slimmer too.
Disc Two:
Take two minutes to pray five times a day, and you are ten minutes into a new way of living!
And yet, this is just the beginning.
As in any totalitarian society it then becomes the role of the state controlled popular media to promote the approved doctrine in the propaganda beamed into the homes of the population by means of misreported news or fictional drama bearing no resemblance to reality, with the effect that, over time, the lie becomes a universally accepted truth.
Pride of the Yankees
Peel, deseed and cut tomatoes. Chop onion and mince garlic and keep ready.
And she caught on pretty quickly. What you can’t see is the ball she threw unassisted went into the next lane and rolled back down to us. She’s not quite got the muscle power yet to heave it up there….so I actually rolled most of them.
Cream colored ponies and crisp apple strudels,
“No, I always forget the punch line.”
Somewhere in between together
If we can, we must view our disquieted lives as a great blessing: the waking of a slumbering Church; one at ease with temporal blessings. While the rationality of man continues to dissolve into a pool of relativism, we who are in Christ are being given great gains. As we think upon all the evils around us, we have to consider our own natures and deal with the inconsistencies I believe we all find within ourselves. Below is a work by Thomas Watson. It details the depth of Adam’s first sin, original sin, and I believe can add insight to the sins we see within ourselves on a daily basis. Not to beat us down as under a whip of legalism, this self-reflection affords us an opportunity to correctly see more clearly our own natures and how desperately we need to flee to the safety of our saviour; to throw ourselves at God and to serve Him wholly as He rightly desires. These stormy seas we live in are meant, in part, to bring us into right standing with Him. And right standing is recognizing Him as a sovereign and Holy God and that without Him we are utterly and totally lost. It is only He that can hold us up with His hand of righteousness.
I changed my "flavicon". The logo beside my URL, that used to be the blogger symbol, is now a photo I took that I also use as my "Blogs I Heart" label and the labels to divide my DIY projects by theme. Learn how to change your flavicon in this post by Olga @ Stardust-Decor&Style.
7. (Unknown)
do watching an hour of TV,
The slide was supposed to be a water slide, but turned out to be a dry slide (my mistake). All’s well that ends well, though, because the weather was not exactly water slide weather. The food was potluck, so it wasn’t very much work at all. Everyone had a super good time!
Many studies have been conducted on the effects of fluoride on the human body and some notable adverse effects have been noted: it changes bone structure and strength, impairs the immune system and it was linked to some cancers. Another alarming consequence of fluoridation is its effects on brain functions:
He wants us to return to God, while he and 300,000 other people are prostrating themselves at the altar of nationalism. The Biblical record is clear that God does not care about maintaining empires. He causes them to be built, and causes them to be destroyed, according to His purposes. That he has no use for blind nationalism should be clear from the fall of Israel and Judaea in the books of the Kings, and of Babylonia in the book of Daniel.
There's something about metal bands that is so hot. I'm totally obsessed at the moment.
2nd pic, the same but with Lizzie Brodie (holding Alexandra)
I FINALLY did a little layout about my new scrap studio
I remember sharing my insights about data early in my career, with a team that saw it differently. Things soured up pretty quickly. I saw myself as part of the team – I was keen to hear their voices and add my own to the mix. I thought I was valuing their input and they likely thought otherwise. I’ve now learned to share the data and offer opportunities for my team to engage with it and draw their own conclusions. If necessary, I now use questions to channel conversations towards important aspects of the data and learn what they think. In most situations, I’ve seen that my team comes up with insights that I have not considered – whether or not I agree with them is irrelevant because they have given me something new to think about. I’ve learned that putting my ideas and opinions on the table is less useful than having my staff make meaning on their own. I do add my voice to the mix, often by sharing my reflections, but I am learning to do this after they have engaged with the ideas and issues.
20 I Got Love
The Monroe County Sheriff's Office says a man who led a deputy on a high-speed pursuit told investigators he was sleeping, not driving, during the chase.
Note: No one will ever do this category justice, because Japanese society is filled to the brim with cute things. This is merely a feeble attempt at giving insight into the cuteness of Japanese society.
That rampant in me run; the mind’s huge barns
There are lots of blogs and websites out there with advice about freezer cooking. Lots of them emphasise the concept of Once a Month Cooking (OAMC).
I don’t know why the flash of metal; the mere fact that a gun was staring me down, didn’t surprise me as much as the make of the weapon. It was one of the old revolvers I used to see in the movies my old man liked.
me: "i don't understand. what does flow mean?"
To make the sauce: combine all of the ingredients in a small saucepan. Bring to a boil then reduce the heat and simmer for about 6 minutes, or until the sauce has thickened slightly.
Thanks for letting me read Joe Kramath's (sic) The List. I', sorry to say that despite the good writing and humor, I think the story may be too fabulous for us to publish it successfully. Thanks again and best of luck to you and the author. - Little, Brown and Company
Have you ever taken a chemistry or physics lab class? Even in the introductory level courses it is extremely difficult to even SET UP the experiments properly. More than half the class usually ends up with soot on their faces and complete failures to execute the experiment.
Dear Gentle People,
This month's new first five pages workshop will open at noon today. We'll take the first five middle grade or young adult entries of no more than 1250 words that meet ALL the submission guidelines. (See the full guidelines here.)
It is constant and irreverent
While I’m having a lovely time seeing friends and family again, there’s absolutely no doubt that Paul is the one who’s enjoying this holiday more than anybody, mostly because he’s being treated as an equal by everybody and given the chance to prove himself capable. In fact, I think this is probably his best holiday for a very, very long time. I have to admit that I was a bit apprehensive about bringing him with me because, what with my disability and his, we're a bit like the blind leading the blind at times, but he hadn't been back since we left to move back to the UK twelve years ago so it was only fair he came too. I'm glad he did. Sometimes you just have to throw yourself into a situation and hope for the best.
Selection Information
Pokémon Yellow
A few more tyres burnt on the roads of Bahrain. And teargas, making healthy breathing a bit more difficult for the residents. That’s all. The petty protests that got hyped by the Western media were subdued and without bloodshed.
The air has finally begun to cool.
Or disrupt their lives.
I am thinking...about a family from my church. Their precious three year old daughter was diagnosed with brain cancer a few months ago. They are an inspiring family. Please pray with me for the Douglas family. Their daughter's name is Madi. You can visit her CaringBridge journal here: Madi
Yes, I know there are many people who think time also deceives -- and it does -- and that Lemon, Rice and Sutter among others SHOULD NOT be in the Hall of Fame. Sure, I know there are people who think only first-ballot Hall of Famers should be Hall of Famers -- only the slam dunk choices, only the ones you just KNOW are Hall of Famers the way you know that the sky is blue, that every exotic meat tastes "a little bit like chicken" and that Parks and Recreation is on NBC on Thursday nights.
The curious thing, of course, is that similar values were also observable in ancient Greece and Rome and may even have been what underlay the city-states of the original human civilization in Mesopotamia. The affinity of the Anglo-Saxon and Nordic people for democracy is certainly very reminiscent of ancient Greek democracy and the early Roman republic and, in turn, the city-states that characterized ancient Greece and Rome are very reminiscent of ancient Mesopotamia. What appears to have happened is that the human race has a great tendency towards centralization of government -- seen vividly in the Pharaohs of ancient Egypt, in the bureaucratic states of pre-modern China, in various Babylonian, Assyrian, Persian, Roman, Moghul and Ottoman empires, in the Kings of Mediaeval Europe and in the vast swathe of communist bureaucracies in the 20th century. And this centralizing tendency almost always seems to triumph over an even earlier tendency towards respect for the individual and a form of government that is directly responsive in some way to the popular will. And it is that very early tradition that only the Anglo-Saxons -- and their close relatives in Scandinavia and the Netherlands -- have carried forward into the modern world. Only among the Anglo-Saxons and their close relatives did the power of centralism never quite succeed in squashing human dreams for responsive, respectful and representative government. And it is this dream that conservatives of the English-speaking world carry forward today.
The vignettes were so creative and colorful wherever we looked.
Anelli, Melissa. Harry, A History: The True Story of a Boy Wizard, His Fans, and Life Inside the Harry Potter Phenomenon. Pocket, 2008.
Once they had their robes and wands, it was time for spell class. Each wizard got his very own spell book and a magical creatures book. They learned some important spells. Then we went through the magical creatures book in order to prepare for a magical creatures hunt.
Step 13:
Editor’s Note: This is the very personal, inspiring life story of Peggy Abner, who I met on Twitter just about a week ago. Some things Peggy mentions and some pictures may not be appropriate for younger readers. Parental and reader discretion is advised. The pictures of the rashes on the chest, arms and legs, and also the picture of the uterus are NOT Peggy. I got them off Google to show what could happen if someone has lupus.
What the boss needs to know
At the time, I was of course aware of Bela Lugosi's famous 1930 portrayal of Dracula, but I found the Salem's Lot vampire much more frightening and believable: less human or "civilized" than Lugosi and much more like a bald, rat-like, animalistic bloodsucker. Nasty!
Fuller’s London Pride England, Premium Bitter, 4.7% abv
Greetings, Star Warriors!
Here was this man in a 83 year old body with the sharpest of minds.
Our hotel in Prague was a renovated 13th century monastery. I knew that when I booked it. However, due to some sort of luck (and probably a little bit of Texas charm) the very nice girl at chieck in gave us a SUITE which is the single most incredible hotel room I have ever stayed in. I couldn't believe it when I went in there the first time, I started jumping up and down with glee.
If your laptop is still making you mad,
I have been trying to write for the past week, without much success, about some of the challenges facing us at the moment.
My week has been OK - work has been a little crazy since mid-April and I don't see that changing for awhile. Not sure what we will do this weekend - something for Mothers Day Sunday. Must do some laundry tomorrow.
BLUES CITY DELI 314-773-8225 www.bluescitycafe.com 2438 MCNAIR AVE. ST. LOUIS, MO 63104
Ok, I need to stop lying to myself. I'll never stop trying to learn new crafts, I'll never stop reading two or three books at the same time, and I'll never have just one project. That reminds me, I really should get started on Halloween costumes soon. Maybe I'll be able to get a sewing machine set up and working soon and even get a little money set aside to buy fabric. Here's hoping!
you might be interested in
I use Pellon featherweight, which you can buy by the yard at JoAnn's or Hancocks. Here is my interfacing and fabric:
A revamped packaging across the range and a focus shift from the native Tasmanian Tiger to the heritage and history of the brewery buildings themselves in the labelling and advertising, along with a very slick, but honest, development of the company website might just remind drinkers that it’s not necessarily a bad thing to produce standard representations of beer styles in your range, that it’s OK to have a portfolio of beers that doesn’t include high alcohol hop bombs or barrel-aged bangers – as long as you do what you do well.
This is how it should be done: Lodge yourself on a stratum, experiment with the opportunities it offers, find an advantageous place on it, find potential movements of deterritorialization, possible lines of flight, experience them, produce flow conjunctions here and there, try out continuums of intensities segment by segment, have a small plot of new land at all times. Deleuze and Guattari, 2004:178
Pretzels or Chips? If we’re allowing Synder’s flavored Buffalo Chicken Pretzel bites, then pretzels. If we’re not, then chips… but even then, salt and vinegar chips. I’m not one for a plain pretzel or chip.
Now apply a little bit of glue at the ends that are sticking out and just glue them down to the cone.
And, hey, who doesn’t want to spend $12.99 (plus shipping, handling, packaging, and processing) on music compiled by a trustworthy stranger like me? Hey! It even has colorful album art. We know you like colors.
A great place (and reasonably priced!) to take visiting relatives to is the Tropical Wings Zoo in South Woodham Ferrers, which is a stones throw away from Chelmsford.
confusion of a waking nightmare in which revelations of her past lead to a frantic crescendo.
Max Joseph worked on Nike’s recent ‘Make It Count’ campaign and created what I feel is one amazing video about just that, ‘making it count.’. Nike gave Max a budget to film a short video about making it count and to his credit he literally made every dollar count.
My question for you lovely readers is this...
“The local people are phenomenal,” says Michael. “The climate is great, the food is wonderful and it’s just relaxing. All the things you read about that are going on in Mexico, you just don’t feel them when you are there … Mazatlan is a great city.”
The festival is just what you might expect for something split between a community organisation, dedicated to supporting literacy and storytelling, and a pub. 2D is not big or impersonal or corporate. There's mercifully little fan rancour or jadedness, no division between commercial and small press creators. Nothing gets taken too seriously. All of it, through whatever funding miracle David Campbell, of the Verbal Arts Centre, and his team have been able to conjure up, is free.
So, first things first: March had a total of 21,499 visitors, and April had 19,918 visitors. Just a bit of a slow period there.
- The leaves are naturally dried or gently heated, removing nearly all moisture
I worked on him every day keeping him hidden from Jenny's eyes---I didn't want to disappoint her but more, I knew that I would find a home for him sometime.
The earth is flatter now than a tin tray,
"If folks really want the link, I’ll send it, maybe. But this isn’t feminism. This is pretty clearly personal. This is someone getting all “FUCK YOU” over I am just not sure what, after I’ve done everything in my power to re-affirm that I like her and don’t need her to agree with me. So, yeah. It doesn’t have to be a spectator sport. I just mention it because, wow. Shit got pretty real these past two weeks. But this?
I put it shining anywhere I please.
I didn't even attempt to quiet down Nestling Sparrow last night. I got him up and brought him out into the living room at 4 in the morning, so the Spouse Sparrow could sleep. I figured he could sit on my lap, while I surfed the Net.
Did you know they once employed a drummer named John Gillis who later changed his name to Jack White after marrying Meg White and starting the White Stripes?
She estimates these fins sell for around $100 per kilogram with demand coming from Asian markets whereshark fin soup can be found on the menu for weddings and business banquets.
In 2011 the NHS Bristol Board made the decision to re-commission the
The pics were taken inside Madpotter's pottery, and those are his pieces around mine.
From there, it’s only a short walk to the riverbank.
